RUN- and grab up some of the latest goodies from Crate, Pink Paislee, Maya Road and other favorite brands.
Howdy! Today I’m pleased to announce a new feature called Wordoodle!
quite indulgent too – just focusing on the things that I like, and excluding the rest which monopolize normal life. In addition, that’s without mentioning all the beautiful blogs that I’ve come across along the way, giving inspiration and ideas and opening up my eyes and changing my view of the world around me,
Long Beach, New York (population 33,275): Officials said the details of a contract between Long Beach and City Manager Jack Schnirman should be finalized by March after the City Council passed a resolution last week allowing the city to enter into a contract with Schnirman, according to Newsday.The two-year agreement will provide security for Schnirman and clear guidelines for his responsibilities to Long Beach, said Councilman Scott Mandel. Mandel said having a contract “puts the position on a level that’s outside of political influence to some extent.” Former City Manager Charles Theofan did not have a contract, council members said, but former City Manager Glen Spiritis did, and so have others. Council president Fran Adelson said the council would follow past guidelines, but that this contract would have fewer privileges. ”There was a provision in a contract that gave the city manager a car, and that provision has been stricken,” Adelson said, citing costs of gas, insurance and wear and tear. Council vice president Len Torres said the city hopes to auction off the black, eight-cylinder Chrysler 300 that Theofan drove during his tenure. Schnirman said this contract won’t have “executive days,” and that he would be entitled to only as many leave days as other management employees. According to the International City/County Management Association, more than 89 percent of city managers have contracts. The contract will reflect Schnirman’s annual salary of $157,988 and will be made available to the public once finalized, council members said.
I have to say, if WordPress keeps dropping my posts than I’m going to a different blogging company. It gets very old having to redo a post all the time because I hit publish and it cuts it off. Very irritating to me.
JUSTICE DEPARTMENT AWARDS $127 MILLION TO IMPROVE TRIBAL PUBLIC SAFETY AND CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Hope you decide to come along for the ride.
The worst offender was yet again for the 11th year in a row is, UNICEF -
Well, we are coming up on six years of homeschooling. The girls are 16 and 14. And do you know what? We are still seeing the effects of that time they spent in school. Chloe is an instinctive mathematician who before school used to beg us to give her story problems to do. Then came the awful day when she came home from school and announced that she hated math. She is only now getting over her resistance to "formal" math (as opposed to real life math, which she does all the time).
“Yea, we good,” Pam said, “You can still get shit?”
"This South African genus is named Mandelia to honour Nelson Mandela, who led the struggle for a multiracial government in South Africa. The specific name is derived from the Latin mirus (odd) and cornus (horn) in reference to the peculiar shape of the rhinophores of this species."
Finally, I had to share my spice rack. Growing up, my mom kept her McCormick tins of spices in a drawer, which smelled like heaven when you slid it open. The bad part though was that you had to rifle through them to find what you wanted. Later, when I had roommates and was in college, I kept a plastic tub full of spices. Talk about a pain! Thanks to these nice containers, I can keep all my spices in one place where I can see them. Eventually I'd like to hang a sheet of metal on the inside of my pantry door so I can put them in a darker location, but for now they are all down one side of my fridge where I cook. They look nice, and they are super convenient. (By the way, I purchased the spice tins from Bed, Bath, and Beyond. One box of these was a gift, but the remaining ones I picked up were expensive when purchased individually. If you ask them how much for the box, sometimes they will reduce the overall cost.)
I am sure you will all join me in welcoming them to the Crafty Calendar Challenge Design Team!
TAG TEAM CONTENDERS:
I glare, "Some of us only have one working hand." I say.
This summer, the National Sports Collectors Convention should partner with Ron Santo's favorite charity, the Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation (JDRF).
As nations such as Canada, Great Britain, the Netherlands (and many others in Europe) have become more secular, they have demonstrated a willingness to embrace virtually anything – anything except their traditional Christian foundations. In fact, they now regularly repudiate those foundations, promoting abortion, legalizing homosexual marriage, and changing their traditional legal codes. And accepting the falsehood that all beliefs are equal and that truth is relative, they have even been willing to incorporate Islamic Sharia law into their legal codes in order to protect the special practices of some Muslims living among them. This has energized many Muslims in those countries and they are displaying a new boldness that is vocal, visible, and demonstrably assertive.
Construction collaboration with PDFs has been utilized poorly. Even with the Microsoft Office 2010 release that gives you the ability to convert documents to PDF built-in, it’s lacking when it comes to collaboration for the AEC Industry. To help change that I’ll share some best practices and features that contractors, architects and estimators perhaps weren’t aware of. What PDFs do best is share documents in a format that everyone can access. Print to PDF gets the document out of that technical construction software package (AutoCAD, Revit, etc) and serves it up for every construction team member, without needing the same software. This will be a series of posts that will discuss construction collaboration using PDFs for Estimating Takeoffs, Converting Large Format and 3D Drawings, AutoCAD and Revit Integration, Drawing comparisons, Hyperlink referencing, Tablet PCs, and Sharepoint.
He quickly said, "I don't know, lets go find out together."
Hope you like it as much as I do...
You need to sponsor and pass a law regarding the right to keep and bear arms. I suggest you mandate every citizen purchase a firearm so that they may “Keep and Bear” it, (we can make an exception for felons) so that their responsible fellow citizens won't be burdened with having to put themselves in danger to defend those who are not responsible enough to purchase their own.
Mia Jones
until she lands, teetering on wobbly show~girl legs, on the lip of my Michelob....
So all I can do is tell you my favourite sisters from my favourite stories. There were books I should have
which is a thought that I push right on out of my mind the minute it pops up. There is a limit on how much I allow myself to worry about at one time. Anyway, even the dogs are learning to wipe their feet before they come in the house as we are doing everything we can to keep the house clean between
Only thing I use my turntables for now is scratch work.
They look very peaceful
imagination is a helpful ally in this endeavor. if you are staying home, and the home is not damaged, you are in good shape. but what if you are on the road or forced to take to the hills when calamity strikes? do you have ponchos or 2 shelter halves to make a tent with? do you have a bivvy sack, sleeping mats and bags? do you have a hatchet to help you build a lean to or debris shelter? remember, if things really go to shit, others will have taken to the hills also, and will be looking for obvious shelter too, such as YOUR home. how will you defend it and your food and water stores?
“It is a changed Labour Party that is standing in these local elections and we will continue to change. Showing we can change our economy and it will make a difference to peoples’ lives, showing we can deliver even in tough times and that we can change our party.
She clarified that in the term Chitta Suddhi, refers to the union of chitta-manas-buddhi.
In Fort Connor, Colorado, IT consultant and House of Lambspun knitter Megan Smith is marrying attorney Marty Harrington. A friend of the bride and groom, CPA and House of Lambspun knitter Kelly Flynn is happy for them and relishes the honor of being a bridesmaid.
So there's my novel of Gestational Diabetes, hopefully next week, I will be able to share more about it and have a better understanding.
No you would not. I can assure you right now. You. Do. Not. Want. To. Know. Who. or what Will is.
You hate the enemy, but you are the enemy,
Manufactured by Gallery Leather
Grayson was one of four teenagers convicted for the 1994 torture and murder of Vicki Lynn DeBlieux, who was hitchhiking on Interstate 59. She was beaten and her body was thrown off a cliff and later mutilated.
Not getting anywhere Julie and Cliff rent a car. Lyle is driving right behind them. They manage to make it to San Francisco. Cliff registers Julie under an alias. Her phone rings. It’s Lyle.
Finally on break for the holidays! Took Thursday and Friday off this past week and am taking all of this coming week off for vacation. :-) I will also be working from home the week after that. What does all this mean? Johnny finally gets a nice 2.5 week break at home with Theresa for the holidays!
I'm in Sainsbury's. My life is beyond exciting. It's Yciting. It's almost Zciting.
Whether or not that happens, someone has to do it. It is ridiculous in 2011 still to be sending court clerks to flick through paper files and bespeak copies of documents. Ipad users don't even know what "bespeak" means".PatLit invites and welcomes readers' comments on this topic.
And so I will choose for life a non negotiable of staying in a city, with my sirens and street parking and $400,000 for a one bedroom??? And let's not forget traffic and is it legal for corner stores to mark up Laughing Cow/Yellow Tail/Playtex by 50%?
“You know you don’t really have to be rude.”
Shake, shake.
Cashews - 2 tsps
Martin Killing Tops U.S. News Coverage; Accounts Sharply Differ
What happened to the caterpillar? (He changed into a butterfly.)
prayer — added to the show at
Once the Setup is done your folder will appear and you can select the folder to see your Inbox
Cinematography: Andrew Osborne. Directing: Alison Sfass. Editing: Lindsey Mckitterick & Andrew Osborne. Special thanks to: Tommy Bruce, Joanna Zwickel, and Lindsay Strott.
I am a sucker for a good inspirational quote. I have them all over my house. An inspiration board is a great place to have all the things you love displayed. This board makes me happy and everything on it inspires me and reminds me how much I love design!
Join Four Chambers
“Probably. Who was the woman? What did she look like? Young? Older?”
Walters
I'll repeat that again: I. Do. Not. Want. To. Hear. About. It. Period.
See suddenly a shining knight
could ever be: tadpole, butterfly
I won’t forgive
Real Ale Han's Pils
But it’s too late to say you’re sorry
So for our last pop-up event for 2010, we packed our bags
“Anything connected to Krishna is extremely purifying and beneficial for human beings. His name, for example, very easily frees everyone from the inescapably complex and frightening web of illusions. His servants and friends, for example, purify a human more than the Ganges river – just by being in their company. So we think that poems about Krishna and his confidential partners must be the most beneficial thing to purify and uplift humanity, especially in the Age of Quarrel.”
This past weekend saw the tragic passing of British singer Amy Winehouse. Police discovered her body at her Camden home at 4pm Saturday 23rd July. She was 27 years old. The world’s media and social media platfroms have since ignited with reports, dedications, condolences and of course, critical views on the state of Amy’s health at the time of her death. We are all firmly aware of the drink and drug problems the plagued Amy’s public and private life, thanks in part to the nature of today’s media, but also thanks to some public engagements where Amy has looked extremely unwell, vulnerable and as though she was suffering from the effects of drink and drugs. With a post-mortem due at some point today (Monday 25th), all the world’s media awaits the autopsy results they are predicting.
these are my plans
When all I want to do is cuddle closer
Say 'Yahoo!' for the Greatest City in Canada, the 'Heart of the New West', the 'Stampede City', where we'll celebrate 100 years of history and Human Achievement in modern facilities and on big screen televisions around the world!
I don't know about anyone else, but I felt this weird sense of concern for the structural integrity of Season's black silk stockings as Vice Squad slithered along. In fact, there were times when I could think about nothing but her stockings. Unconvinced? Well, think about all the stress and turmoil your average prostitute must endure on any given night. Pretty unpleasant, right? Now think about what their clothes must go through. I know, horrifying, ain't it? Every time Princess came in contact with Ramrod, I would get this uneasy feeling, not because he was probably going to make her eat his switchblade, but because he was going to ruin her outfit. Crazy, I know, but that's what happens to a person when they spend way too much time wallowing in the neon slime.
That’s more like it Mahoney. What are you doing in Nashville? What are we doing in Nashville? You mean strolling around town in 30C weather in a pair of loafers, shorts and t shirts, listing to the tunes, taking in the aromas of smokey bbq’s and meat & three’s, sipping on cocktails being all decadent and that isn’t reason enough to be in Nashville?
Level 11: MP Cost: 36, Duration: 126 seconds, Damage: +22%, Critical Rate: +14%, Minimum Critical Damage: +6%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
I know a lot of people love this Doctor, but to me I cant get excited about an earth bound Doctor who didnt have access to his TARDIS. This Doctor was written to be an older James Bond. While I enjoy all things Doctor Who, this has to be my least favorite version. I prefer my Doctor a little bit more Time Lord a little less secret agent.
The incident had a tremendous negative effect on everything in my life: work, relationships, physical health and mental health. So much so, that in the 5 months since it happened, I have literally gone through the 5 stages of grief: Denial, Anger, Bargaining, Depression and finally Acceptance.
I just have to give a nod, high five and a standing ovation to many of the bloggers out there, especially the ones I have linked on the right column (right over there and down a little, see the list???), for the stamina to blog every single day AND show off their projects and process. I give a shout out to:
Leave me unsung, as I sink beneath these waves
"This attraction will bring millions of pounds into the economy and the benefits to Cardiff will be immense in terms of tourism."
Yuengling & Son Brewery
Yet, I understand from some folks from England that they were also assured that their meat was all right until the government officials could not longer ignore the people who were suffering with this maddening disease. The human form is known as variant Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease (vCJD). The beginning stage is largely one of anxiety, depression and other psychiatric symptoms.
If only the two prime ministers – Pak Lah and Najib had abandoned the ‘Mahathiristic’ mantra of divide and rule, threaten and conquer, fabricate lies and banish opponents, today BN can sail to yet another victorious mandate.
The terrorist reluctantly listened to his wife’s story and halfheartedly agreed to believe. After all, what choice did they have? The pastor’s God had healed their daughter when nothing else worked.
Here is my DT project:
They need to be cuddled.
What I believe though is that he’s a placeholder. A placeholder for the team as the kids get more mature in the minors.
I made a list of my own to help me as I do a my spring cleaning. Each year I host a big multi-family yard sale and this is the first year I won’t be able to do so because I don’t have enough stuff to contribute. Yay! Last year I had very little as well and I think I made less than $20 overall. That’s exciting because it shows me that I’ve done a good job purging and not filling my house with useless things over the last several years. I like to purge out bags and bags of items but so far I’ve only been able to get one large bag together. I’m working hard to clean deeper and organize well. I have goals and with the help of my new list I’m hopeful I’ll find at least 5 more bags of things to purge in the coming weeks.
A week ago we went to get food stamps. I got denied because I have too much money and I didn’t want to commit welfare fraud; $100 or so in government paid food is hardly worth those repercussions. If I had gone to a social service spot in Philly, I wouldn’t have been able to hear myself think. Here there was chatter, but people were whispering, keeping conversations at a normal level. At the DMV, I was in and out in twenty minutes, ten of which were spent taking a driver’s test. In the 99 Cent Only, people said “excuse me” and “oh, I’m sorry” if they were in your way. It really is a whole new world over here. IN SOUTH CENTRAL.
Go into insights, click on engaged users, if someone unliked page or hid it, you will be able to see that as "negative feedback" so you can see what you did to cause that, too.
Then I was shown there is but One
Before you start redrafting your query or revising your novel, I STRONGLY suggest you read at least 50 novels (preferably debut) in the romance and women's fiction category. Really study them to see what agents are looking for and editors are buying. (This novel feels very very 1970s to me: passive woman transformed into angry avenger.) You don't have to like all of them (in fact, you won't) but you have to move away from "I like this" kind of reading to "what works here and what doesn't" analysis if you're going to be a writer. You have to know your category, and that means READ READ READ. Not just for entertainment. For your professional development.
*As many small twig clippings as desired
they've watched me grow up
I have three cards to share today - sort of like the grand finale at the fire works on the 4th of July!
fast food fried chicken and mashed potatoes and a piece of roasted chicken and a salad loaded with fresh veggies for dinner.
Anwaar: Do I have a choice? I have to protect you. But if you can live without this craziness then it will be so much better. The risk of getting caught is so great that—
In exactly SIX WEEKS I'll be a wifey! I'm so lucky to be marrying the most loving, wonderful, caring (and crazy) man. I am scrambling for all the last minute "personal touches" that I will need for the wedding, but so far so good. I need to make lists. Lots of lists. I want to make too many things, but needless to say there will be lots of surprises for all of our 75 guests. :)
Here's what I came up with using an old pair of shorts and part of an old t-shirt:
These two sets of leaflets arrived yesterday as well. Stoney Creek Mythical Fantasies and Dragons and Wizards.
My brief work with the Pakistan Fisherfolk forum (pff) was in a similar vein. Although the group is more ngo-ized, the pff can also, admirably, generate crowds of thousands of mahigir for their conventions. If you miss working with them, you miss some of the key issue facing coastal communities - not the least of which is no provision of safe drinking water. The leadership is affable and open to new people; their language is sharp, but the group fails when it come to integrating the community and allies in decision making.
And the sands of time, I do spread them out now, with your flight life you’re always
HT: Yes. He is my brother. J.R. is a beast. He has been pursuing a career in writing since he was thirteen years old. We used to write Choose Your Own Adventure books when we were kids. J.R. inspires me and encourages me on a daily basis. He is my main reason why I have decided to to this full time. He has always believed in my story telling abilities and I think he is a brilliant writer. Scott Nicholson, he and I are writing a book called 'Night School' together. My brother and have also been talking seriously about writing a paranormal book about William Shakespeare.
“And the people of Michigan looked into the hearts of the candidates, and all I have to say is: I love you back.”
Option 2: I become vegan. This goes against everything I stand for and would likely shock all my friends and family. The key here is that I wouldn’t just become vegan, I would be real high and mighty about it. Like I would even stop smoking and then tell people how bad it is for you and I’d cough if I came in contact with smoke. Wait…can vegans not smoke? This is bullshit.
Man City 10/11(PP), Draw 11/4(Bet365), Tottenham 10/3(StamJames)
Mr. Christie says that he can now push for the tax cuts that he promised would happen if the state controlled its spending. The governor made that promise while seeking the job in 2009, and he recalls the skepticism at various newspapers during the campaign: "They looked at me like I was an alien." Because many media folk couldn't believe the state government could afford to reduce tax rates, "They just basically accused me of lying to get elected."
Still thinking about the blog... until then, find me on facebook I'm there regularly. =)
I Found One!: Find a Brightly Colored Egg. Really basic, find your first hidden egg.
If there was only one song, hmmm ... I think for the novel as a whole it would be Answer by Sarah McLachlan from her album Afterglow (2003).
Prediction 1: Often wrong but never in doubt, the progressives and do-gooders will develop amnesia about the past 40 years of regulatory activism. The old "settled science" will go down the memory hole, to be replaced with a new "settled science." With new demons to castigate and a new cause to justify meddling in peoples' lives on the grounds that they are too ignorant, slothful or obstinate to do what's good for them, progressives will embark joyfully upon a new crusade. Soon we'll be hearing how sugar is as addictive as cocaine. (Oh, wait, Dr. Gupta quoted a different scientist saying exactly that.) Sugar companies will replace the fat peddlers at McDonald's as the new villains du jour. (Dr. Gupta also interviewed a sugar-industry lobbyist.)
preheat oven to 350 degrees. in a stand or electric mixer beat the butter and sugars until light and fluffy. slowly beat in the eggs and vanilla until well combined. in a large bowl combine the flour, cinnamon toast crunch cereal, baking powder and salt. slowly add to wet ingredients along with the white chips until just combined.
In addition I try to walk as much as possible to de-stress and keep my body strong. I'm a long way from being in shape for soccer season, but I do what I can in the winter :p Finally, another major factor in taking good care of myself is, of course, eating well! Keeping my mental and physical functions going at hyper-speed for looooong days and weeks requires the right fuel, just like a car. Eating food that I love relaxes me, but it is even more important to eat things that my body will love. Sugar, caffeine, and simple carbs may give me short bursts of energy and feelings of happiness, but all too soon that high will drop and leave me even more emotionally and physically drained. Instead, I aim to consume foods that give me energy from vitamins and minerals. This means lots of fruits and veggies of every shape and color to boost my immune system and whole grains and legumes for sustained energy. Nuts and seeds are also great sources of complex energy and protein. In addition, about 95% of my liquids are purified water or herbal tea which are essential to keeping my body running smoothly. Of course, I don't meet all of these goals all of the time and sometimes you just need to eat some simple carbs and sugar, but these practices have served me well so far as I'm months away from graduating high school and stepping into the stages of my life and I can take all this craziness and no just die because I'm trying to take care of my mind and body. :)
I used Tilda With Winter Flowers here and think she is great for those non-christmassy cards too. We all love to get flowers all year long, don't we? And even if the papers are christmassy - the sentiment by Stampin'Up, that I put on a big vintage brad using the bradmaker kit, makes this a wonderful "thinking-of-you"-card. All dies are by Magnolia: Spruce Twig, Heart Tag, Hellebores and the swirl, that I can't live without anymore.
You’ve heard the message “The Church – Communion” at the Mid-High gathering. Now here’s what you can do with it the other 6 days of the week:
christmas sprinkles. decorative cupcake toppers.
BILOXI, MS (WLOX) -
Before I left, I had the first act (30-40 pages) of a new screenplay read and critiqued by the group. Amidst my stash of writing was a bunch of the critiques and reading them brought back some fun memories. What really made me smile were the responses to the explicit sex scene I wrote into my screenplay.
Animal rights author “Animal Rights,” “Eternal Treblinka”
“Similarly there are other models which may come with a solar panel on the roof of the house,” Das added.
Well, that time is your chance to get the bathroom into shape with a daily blitz. You have to be with them because they need supervision so that they don't drown and they don't grab razors and Tylenol and Comet and what have you. Yet, most of the time when you are in there, they are playing happily and you are doing nothing! So get off the phone and clean the bathroom!
Raw nuts and seeds are high in Vitamin E which is beneficial to the skin. Selenium keeps the skin elastic and can be found in garlic, onions and shallots.
Emma Dean Allred (1902-1992), wife of Eli Howard.
The simplicity of the color scheme and the little gaggle of snowmen are just too fun. And while I'm guessing not many of you who are in New England are all that eager for the snow to start, I have to say I just love winter and snow and this card just makes me happy! The bermuda ink draws out a little iridescent blue in the diamond glitter!
as they walked slowly towards the men
I’m convinced that guys really just want you to screw with them. They want you to abuse them, make them fear unrequited love. Remember my Bad Boy? Well, I suspect that Bad Boy is in prison, but before he was, he had me wrapped around his finger until I got my senses together. I can tell you that I was way out of Bad Boy’s league and he treated me like gold so long as I didn’t return his phone calls. The minute I fell for him and started picking up that phone, he walked all over me. Same with Mr. Zegna. Just when I thought a guy might be different from all the rest …
The children of a great king are not kept waiting at their father’s door as strangers are.
Our illustrious handsome waiter looked a little confused. Perhaps he picked up on what I was doing, as I guess I wasn’t exactly subtle. “I’ll put your order in,” he said, and made a fairly quick exit.
I want a lens which will be good for portrait shots so preferably something with high aperture since my current lens could only go as high as 3.5. I also want an autofocus lens. My bad eyesight has negative effects on my focusing skills. I’ll ask mom and dad for the lens. They still owe me one from my 18th birthday cause we agreed on 2 lenses.
Time lived between my legs
"Praised and exalted be the Sacrament Divine in which God is present in a hidden manner and offers Himself as the food of souls! Praised also be the Immaculate Conception of the Queen of Heaven, who while remaining a pure virgin, became the Mother of the Eternal Word!"
And how come he doesn’t have any pets? That’s just crazy. Everybody should have a pet.
Amit Bansal answers, This question is asked to check your ability to learn from your mistakes and accept your shortcomings positively with an action plan to work on them. There is nothing wrong in talking about your negative areas. We all have a few.
In my world, spring’s penultimate days were spent fretting over all-important teenage matters. I was busy splitting my time between the anxiety of end-of-term exams and the exciting prospect of summer trips with friends and family. By the time my birthday whizzed past, the constant flux of giddy hope and dismal woe had me capped out emotionally. I could barely focus on my schoolwork, let alone notice what was happening in the world.
The biggest problem is formatting. Your lovely manuscript, that looks so pristine on the page, is quickly mangled the minute you try to change the format. And change the format you must (unless you had the presence of mind to think as far ahead as publishing when you began playing with your first draft). You don't have to like it - but you do have to accept it, and then settle down to untangle it. Then - just when you think you've got it right, it will tangle again. Tantrums are allowed, but only if they give you the energy to try again.
Waiting in line at the Castro theater
However, he did not pass on those details to police or parents.
It was an out n out networking competition and many prolific writers participated in it. Some entries did not reach the top ten or top three due to lack of proper networking but they do deserve a special mention here .
I do not want to have dinner with a movie star.
Time just flew by. I wanted to see more, but we had a train to catch. I had seen plenty of pictures of the famous Altes Rathaus, but then had to choose between trying to get the actual shot of it or catch our train. I chose the latter. We walked through the Rathaus admiring the pretty paintings. To see how it actually looks click here.
It can also hardly be claimed that despite the Chernobyl tourist industry, the existing sarcophagus is in good shape. It is cracked. Whilst it may still be fit for purpose, there is no guarantee that will be the case given its hasty construction at the time, hence the need to create a new sarcophagus.
I don't know what the answer is to saving our libraries. But I do know that they are a vital public service and we need to make a hell of a lot of noise about their potential demise. Read the whole essayAnd Jon Mayhew, author of Mortlock:
My own father told me when I was your age that war and courtship have much in common. You and the enemy dance, one move after another. After a while, you come to know each other, to fall into a familiar pattern like lovers. Step after step, you waltz together whilst all around you, buildings fall, broken down by shot and shell. You pirouette over rotting corpses, spin over wailing women and keening children but all the while your eyes never leave your partner’s.
Cat
This is why blogs like this are needed. Latner's speech is brilliant only in how skilfully it exploits the public's ignorance and the general perception among the educated elite that Jews are particularly moral. Latner contends that Israel is, in fact, rogue, but in the definition of the word as “aberrant, anomalous; misplaced, occurring (esp. in isolation) at an unexpected place or time.” And how is Israel anomalous? Well -- by being exceptionally good.
The winning entrant will win all trhe cute clothes in their styleboards and the socks off our site that go with them. Here are just a few examples of the wonderful outfits they came up with:
Homely guys and girls don’t get STD’s, don’t ye know. And only the handsome young fellows are impotent. Guess it’s time to work on some new pick up lines.
The characters. They deserve more discussion, because my criticisms have been fairly spread out so far:
Boris Volkhonsky*
United 93 is being presented as a part of a series. But this picture is an important first step in that it reminds us of the fear and chaos of that day and provides a metaphor for the larger conflict that would define the decade to come.
so.... chickies. i'm a little behind right now. *ahem* i'm finally getting to starting the craftsy block of the month... jennifer reminded me that i said i was doing it- notice the awesome button declaring that i am. but i haven't actually started it yet. oops. but it's only february 3 so i think i'll be ok.
“This inaction could be seen as tacit approval of corruption and an inability or even unwillingness to crack down on corruption despite many public statements to the contrary,” he said.
When someone does something that they know to be criminal, they resort to increasingly desperate measures in hopes of not getting caught. That’s what happened in this fictitious story line.
He took the tyrant’s sting away,
I look forward to your speedy reply,
Take a second look at the one you love, or maybe even the one that got away – you never know he could have gotten away because of a mere overlooking done by you.
The veneer was in such bad shape we decided simply to remove it altogether.
The card is simple with the focus on the flower. I really like how it turned out. Besides the base, all other pieces are from my scrap pile.
Perfect for Herbs too.
#19 1980 Sergio Oaxaca EP Bel Air Mile/1600 M 4:10.4/4:08.9
Choose tiny plants, with tiny leaves and tiny flowers. The ground-cover section is a good place to look.
I'm looking forward to get getting my final edit of Provex City back within the next few days. It's so close to being available to the public I can already feel the adrenaline creeping in. It's game time, baby!
ZACH: Um…this is a plane ticket.
Recently there's been an i-Tunes only release of 20 odd Blue Meanies tracks. What's the story with this material? Was it recorded for an unreleased album?
H.G. Wells: My name is H.G. Wells. I came here in a time machine of my own construction. I am pursuing Jack the Ripper, who escaped into the future in my machine.
You all have a good Monday!
The woman who came in to do my ultrasound...I think she had been in my room for 2 seconds by the time I started firing questions at her. She was kind and said that the perinatologist would be able to answer them. I just wanted to know if she was going to be looking at specific things...haha She said she had been working there for two weeks (she has done ultrasounds for a lot longer, just new to childrens hospital) .. um...way to attack the new girl. She asked why I was so upset and I told her... because there isn't a picture of my daughter with "danger danger crazy lady" signs on the front of my file. She said that the scan she did on me is the easiest one she's done in a long time because the morphology of the patients she usually sees makes it difficult to visualize structures (read everyone she scans is totally obese) I guess me being 20 pounds over my usual weight although I am still in the normal range for my height doesn't put me in the category of fat in anyone else's book except mine.
But he really came under the media spotlight in 2003 when he and former transport minister Mac Maharaj openly accused the then director of public prosecutions Bulelani Ngcuka of being an apartheid spy.
When you really love something, especially the first book you’ve read by an author, it’s hard not to compare their other works to it. When your expectations are exceeded by the first book, all the subsequent books have a lot to live up to and it’s inevitable that some will fall short. Did I enjoy this book? Yes, I did…quite a bit. Did it hit the same chord with me as TSPOLAFS? No. And I’ve been pondering on that for the last day or two and I think the reason why, is Emma herself.
12. If you could be anyone from 4, who would you be? Karen Gravano
Note: You may want to have an extra jar of sauce on hand. I ended up using a little more than what was called for. (Close to half of the second jar.)
In Italy, the number #13 is looked upon as a lucky number but I do from time to time have a little fun with it , like now; I thought it had a perfect place on my tree.
He knew he seemed crazy. He knew that no ordinary person would be questioning himself with such matters. Perhaps he was just way too introspective. Perhaps…he was just way too confused and psycho.
ie Washing up isn’t simply washing up.
Stick around! There will be fun stuff abounds in the coming days!!
I've had some writing deadlines recently and have been focusing a lot of time and energy on that. I have a little break right now, so I need to go back to focusing on the kids. I've slacked off terribly in reading to them. And when I do read, I forget to record it in their journals. I've been staying up until 2:00 or 3:00 to get everything done and I'm a useless zombie come morning. So, if things slow down around here a bit, it's just because I can't juggle it all and I'd rather drop the "blog" ball than the "kids" ball.
Yet there are always replication errors in the genetics of the hermetic memetic. Every so often the great big cuckoo in our nest reveals itself and things like this give the game away.
Classroom Use: Independent novel for advanced readers 12+.
Joe and I started dating around the Kentucky Derby time back in May of 2006. At that time, we were both working in public accounting in the Washington D.C. area at Grant Thornton. The company paid for us to go to Virginia Gold Cup Races that year. The Gold Cup Steeplechase Races are a big to do, with approximately 50,000 spectators each year. The Kentucky Derby starts only a few hours after the Gold Cup Races. It's a fun time! That day is sort of extra special as it was the first time Joe said 'I love you' to me. I don't think I said anything back to him for a few hours as I was shocked! Well you know how the rest of the story goes...
Our grandmother lives in a teeny tiny fishing village called Polruan. Our first evening there, we had a drinks party on her terrace. She invited her friends of all ages, and we ate smoked salmon and potato chips.
"So, where's the party tonight?"
3 lb light malt extract
Does anybody doubt our ability to get 50,000 people? If I wanted to get 50,000 people to meet me at Trumka's house, do you think I could pull it off? Well, that's what they do. They have all these people showing up at the homes of AIG execs and wherever in Washington, DC. If we were really like them, that's what we would be doing. How about this: How about we treat MSNBC and Howard Fineman like the unions and our government treat Fox News and have thousands of people surround their reporters, block their cameras, manhandle their reporters? How about if we do that? How about if we show up and we start physically assaulting MSNBC reporters like they're doing to Fox reporters?
When I was a kid, I loved picking up rocks and looking at the bugs living underneath. I think it’s the same instinct. It’s not so much a choice, as a predilection of birth.
Only 14 months ago I was a lowly landlady of the Woolpack Inn in Eskdale. The Inn is located in a very remote valley on the western side of the Lake district, over an hour from any motorway and only one long coastal route from Cockermouth to Kendal, North to South. There are no roads East to West, well except for the Hardknott Pass. Three in one hairpin bends, very steep and narrow with not many passing places. Therefore the pub was rather quiet between November and February, plenty of time to have a long relaxing holiday.
There are thousands of competitions out there. They naturally need money to be able to run so generally there is a fee of some sort. There isn’t all that much relationship between the size of the fee and the usefulness of winning or even just submitting to the competition.
Standing innocently at the checkout, not a care in the world as I flipped through an extremely interesting tent brochure because a tent would fit rather snugly in my backpack while I ride my horse of course.......
There are probably several reasons why the Welsh government does not perform such a reorganisation, some more altruistic than others. Any reorganisation would cost money in the short term, even if savings may (or may not) be made in the longer term, it would not be sensible to incur short term costs in light of the currently squeezed public spending settlement. Reorganisation would also cost jobs, always a bad thing but especially so in the light of rising unemployment across the board, a situation which will get worse over the course of the next 5 years or so.
Thrashing around trying to get out.
Thank you for nominating me. I very much appreciate it.
Shankar asked: Why not?
Use the coupon code MAYBOOKS12 and get 20% off! (Don't worry, it doesn't affect us small publishers/sellers. It comes out of Lulu's pocket. And thanks to Chris at Heroes & Other Worlds for the heads up on that one!)
hint ,,, Our sister challenge the Simon Says Stamp and Show Challenge has an Anything Goes theme this week so you may like to link your entry there as well !! :-) Double your chance of winning a $50 Voucher !!! :-)
My heart filled with woe.
Did you know that our First Lady Michelle Obama lost her law license back in 1993? Oh sure I knew that, “NOT.” Sure, I saw this on the front page of the New York Times during the elections of 2008, “NOT.” I've listed below from the State of Illinois’s website of the court action against Michelle forcing her to give up her license. It’s understood that in the box attacked below under Malpractice Insurance – “No malpractice report required as attorney is under court order inactive status.”
Original Screenplay: Woody Allen, Midnight In Paris
Following this, we let the students work in their groups on the feasibility studies for their PA brewpub. As they worked, we also brought up some helpful websites for them to look at, including: RateBeer, the U.S. Census Fact Finder, the PA Restaurant Inspection Database, and the PLCB license search. You can find a lot of neat information on these sites, although you may NOT want to know what health infractions your favorite eatery has been sited for!
the worn out spots, when I didn't care.
Yeah. That "whoever wrote this episode should die," that's the line. How many times must our characters feel this way? Arguing with us, dealing with all of the crap we throw at them, the trauma and misery. Emotional upheaval, physical pain--and we assure them that it's okay, they'll get through it. Or in the case of a tragedy, maybe we assure them it's okay, they'll be out of their misery before long.
This weeks classes are all about Christmas yet again. I figure I can cut down greatly on your stress load if you already have lots of your gifts and cards ready before December when everything get crazy busy.
Years later, I think I was in 2nd grade, my mom bought me Oreo!
Fairport Convention’s early years can best be described as a sequence of transitional periods. The years 1968 to 1970 saw a dizzying amount of line-up changes, stylistic shifts, and personal tragedy (a deadly post-gig van crash after which they nearly called it quits). In that span of two years they also managed to record several classic albums, each with it’s own distinct vibe due to the revolving door of key band members. While their early sound was inspired by West Coast psychedelia and singer-songwriters like Dylan, Richard Farina and Joni Mitchell, they gradually abandoned those influences in favour of a repertoire of electrified British folk songs. This culminated in the 1969 recording of Liege & Lief, by far their most celebrated album. That record (which I’ll admit I find it a little bit underwhelming) was touted as the birth of British folk-rock, and was highlighted by the celestial tones of singer Sandy Denny, and by spirited arrangements of traditional songs like “Tam Lin” and “Matty Groves”, till then unknown in the rock world.
Camberwell, New Delhi, North Shore, Johannesburg: Penguin Group, 2011. Print.
I need to go a step further and share that I also believe it is boastful to adopt even one more child than the Lord calls you to adopt, whether it be child #2 or child #15. The Lord blesses small families and large families... all are beautiful in His sight. God should determine how many children each family has, not the humans involved. When we overreach His will for our lives, we do a disservice to our marriages and the children already in our homes. Just because we have a plethora of material resources does not necessarily mean the Lord believes we have a plethora of emotional resources. I mean, I always wanted a large family, but the Lord has made it clear to me in recent years (through His words and circumstances), that it is not His will for me to be a mom of a large family. How humbling, especially since I know and admire several mommas of large families, including my own sister.
Huge thanks to all of you who joined in with the sketch last week and thanks to everyone who showed interest in our DT call, it's going to run for one more week, so I'll start coming round to visit you all during this week.
I found a beautiful picture off of Google Images after reading one of my magazines showing different ways of scrapbooking images, and thought I'd do the same for a card! Unfortunately I am not very good at taking photos when using glossy paper, so I have a glare from the flash. I have used my fab glitter pen on the fireworks to add some sparkle.
There isn’t really romance in this book, like I originally thought, but the love that is evident in Sarai and Abram after over fifty years of marriage is the stuff of dreams. Passion is the last thing Sarai and Abram’s marriage is lacking. There is sex mentioned in this book, naturally due to the contents, however, it’s discreet and talked about in biblical lingo. Seduction is also something handled in this book, again discreetly and again in biblical language, making hardly something to worry about.
Which, wash'd away, shall scour my shame with it:
While the guards might not have been impressed with the size of 41's breasts, 14, 10, and 24 can't seem to get enough of them (14, in fact, says, and I quote, "her tiny tits excite me"). Who are these mosquito bite aficionados? Well, all I know about 24 is that she has an English accent and has the number 24 branded above her left nipple. As for 14 (Peggy Markoff). Let's see, she's a post-op trans woman who enjoys knitting, lesbianism, and watching shower fights (oh, and get on her good side and she might let you call her 7). Who's kidding who? The only number in that group that really matters is 10 (Lina Romay), the sexist woman to roam the halls of a shoddily run correctional institute since a certain pigment challenged enchantress in dark charcoal grey stockings headbutted her way into my heart. Sauntering into the clinic's sleeping quarters, her arms akimbo, the short-haired slice of gorgeosity is clearly in command (keep an eye on her when sits on her bed, it's obvious she hikes up her uniform with the sole purpose of reveling more of her delicious pussy). Unfazed over the fact that 41 didn't notice her exposed vagina (not even a cursory cunt coup d'oeil is thrown her way), 10 jumps to her feet (which are covered with a pair of beige boots) and starts to inspect 41's super-tight body.
Then in the afternoon I met
“Yes, but apparently they need the money from drug-dealing to feed their families. They say I should stop because I was the one who got her addicted to heroin, and because I don’t actually need the income.”
Most parts of Japan can be accessible for a cheaper price when you buy a pass for that area for a number of days! In this case, I bought the All-Nikko Pass which covers 4 days around the area, and costed 4400yen. The ticket covers a round trip to and fro Nikko from Asakusa and back, and unlimited bus rides in Nikko to visit all the locations that will be mentioned in this series and free admission to two shrines and one temple. That pretty much covers all of the transportation costs, leaving the admission tickets for the shrines at 1000yen per person, oh and the Kegon waterfall ride 300yen per person.
Let’s think about it today and every other day. Only then, will the value of a woman be truly realized.
Sweet Tooth Fairy, Amano Chocolate, Orson Gygi, Dawn Stark Designs, ZipFizz, Zagg, DownEast Outfitters, American Crafts, Lifestyle Crafts, Scrapbox, CityPASS, and Vivint.
I'll be back to posting soon!
The Post Card rubber stamp is from Stampin Up and the Carte Postale is from Stempelglede.
“Humans were made to look, listen and feel.”
Happy Saturday everyone! Today we have a new Digi Release and some winners for our Blog Hop!
But first, this is what arrived today:
Mueller is hoping to reopen in a new location, but that takes scratch. In order to raise some, he'll be selling $5 barbecue plates at Kellie's Place (corner of 5th St. and Pedernales) this Saturday, February 4 from 10am until the meat's all gone.
Isn’t it dreamy!? I want to shrink and live inside it! Everything is better in 1/6/ 1/12 scale. Gosh, I just adore this dollhouse. Found here.
I climbed up to the pool deck to assess the damage. And there, right in the middle of the pool, was a fairly large poop. And it wasn't a floater, because that would be too easy. No, it was a sinker and it was sitting at the bottom of the pool, mocking me. My brother was there, laughing at me and disgusted with me, simultaneously. I asked him where Kerry (the owner of the pool) was and what the "plan" was. Do pool owners have special equipment for such things? No, they don't. The plan was to use a pail and the pool cleaner net thingy to dive down to the bottom of the pool and scoop out the poop. So, Kerry and I put on some kid goggles, each got a pail and net thingy, and took turns diving for poop. Ya...that really happened.
Hourglass Visionaire Eye Shadow Duo Visionaire pairs two complementary shades of supersmooth color that create gorgeous looks singly or together. Each versatile hue may be applied dry for a natural look or wet for greater intensity.
The good news is that he has not worsened!! He is still on a moderatley low amount of thickening and he tolerates it. The situation could be much worse. I hold on to that fact and thank God that while we have to deal with daily stuggles and complications, we are blessed to not be dealt even more difficult cards. All in all it was a good morning/afternoon birthday. Josh spent it happy, healthy and entertained. He ran the halls of the hospital with his Buzz Lightyear flip flops, played the lobby piano, watched some Disney, colored, had his picutre taken and played some more! I don't think the kid minded... not too shabby!
Season with sea salt and pepper and oregano
Remember in the book the psychology of the electric fence in 12? It was never on, but she always like listened to make sure. Remember how hunting was hard? Remember how everyone was basically starving all the time? They are in the forest for 3 seconds, they are all well fed, Gale even had Tiger Beat magazine hair. Food was such a big deal in the book from hunting, to putting your name in the bag more for grain, to eating crazy shit in the Capitol to starving to death eight times in the arena.
Mountain Goat co-founder and Executive (I don’t have to clean out the Mash Tun no more) Brewer Dave Bonighton and popular Road Goat, Tom Delmont were on hand to share the Goat Story as well as a representative selection of the fruits of the brewer’s craft. The beers were matched brilliantly with a series of dishes, each attempting to – and succeeding in – outdoing the last.
This cable comes out from time to time and connects my pc to my sound system, so I can play music while I work.
And Momo and Elfrid came as well! Momo made a delicious marzipan-covered cream cake, and I made some very simple vanilla cupcakes.
I scheduled a surgery to get it fixed in early September. About a week after I scheduled it I found out I was pregnant. I called back and cancelled. Well, it turns out I miscarried right before I would have had the surgery, but I was glad I had decided not to do it. Mostly just because it was two days before Peach Days. And what would I have done if I couldn't have gone to Peach Days?
And then we had a company called Higashi Nippon House. They make cheap housing in northeastern Japan.
as undersea caverns
Because my son-in-law is going to know I'm a nut. Besides, he'll love me. I'm going to always take his side, just to piss off The Girl.
Essentially, to keep the fire burning you have to have a deeper reason to be doing this in the first place. Because it’s “cool” won’t last a week. “Dig deep” is what they say when a guy is sucking on a foot march or a run. If you do this right, there should be a whole lot of mental tumbling going on when a person decides this is what they want to do as a profession. This is a serious business, and it deserves serious thought. Being burned out will happen from time to time. The physical exhaustion of military service, the stress of leadership and the mission, and balancing these with social and familiar obligations will eventually pile up to a point that overwhelms a person. If we’ve done the mental gymnastics that answer the question “why” beforehand though, then “digging deep” will never be necessary – the answer will always be right there.
Did the industrials back in the day task out the USDA to cook up substitutes just in case of a catastrophic European crop failure, or to leverage against price or supply manipulations? Did the industrials simply want substitutes for Hallertauer mf, Saazer and Tettnanger as an insurance policy in case the real McCoy weren’t available?
5. like a little nap after we eat our lunch.
Those granted asylum get priority over British people. When they arrive they are homeless and do not bring houses with them so they must be taking ours. Brits on the waiting list may live in overcrowded conditions or in squalor, or may have a health priority such as spores from black mould in the house getting on their childrens’ lungs. But they will be classed as having a home and abandoned.
Sun lunch - homemade raman noodles
In my mind, I'm 24 years old. I'm eager to look as chic as you and study your outfits like the Talmud. I aspire to your level of beauty so, regardless of how short I fall in reaching that goal, please accept that I try. And try.
Listen, Im not trying to be cheap or bitchy or Grinchy or whatever...Im just kind of fed up and I dont care who knows it anymore.
I am going to take a little break from blogging over the next week or so. I became sick a few days ago and have been resting at Elena & María's home in Albacete since last Thursday. Our plans have gotten all mixed up to due to my health and various other things - but all is well! Their mother, Juani, has been treating me as though I were her own daughter and is taking good care of me. Such a sweet woman! I am so grateful for my friends - they have been our angels on this trip.
dreaming about summer
Put another chip on top of the goat cheese.
More flexible marking practicesWith respect to marking requirements in the US, 35 U.S.C. §287 places limitations on the damages recoverable to a patentee in the absence of patent marking. In particular, a patentee claiming infringement of a claim to a “patented article” must mark that article with the patent number in order to receive damages for up to six years of past infringement – in the absence of such marking, the patentee can only expect to recover damages after actual notice of the infringement is given to the infringer. Prior to enactment of the AIA, US law required the patentee to mark the patent number on the product itself or, when impractical, to a package or label. While the patented article must still be marked, under the newly revised §287, patentees are allowed to mark patented articles with a website that lists one or more patents on the patented article. Specifically, the patentee must mark the patented article with the word “patent” or the abbreviation “pat.” together with an address of a posting on the Internet – accessible to the public without charge – that associates the patented article with the number of the patent. Thus, it is reasonable to assume that a patentee could mark all their products with the same marking and then break out which products are believed to be covered by which patents; although court decisions will still be needed to provide guidance on whether a specific marking practice is adequate.
___ Add 1/2 teaspoon curry powder to jam
Now, as the feller Kev always says, it's back to the mill.
A May 11th Reuters news article published in the Jerusalem Post was titled “Obama may preempt PM’s speech to U.S. Congress.” Benyamin Netanyahu, at the invitation of Speaker John Boehner, will address the Congress on May 24. If President Obama delivers a speech about “political change in the Middle East and North Africa” prior to the PM, it will be impossible to deny that it is a deliberate effort to rebut in advance anything Netanyahu says.
c) Don’t suffocate people with time and attention. They also need some time to themselves right?
I was searching so long for this colour! Remember the violet lipstick I was wearing in one post? It was just in that palette I've got, so I needed a real lipstick. This is a little heavier now, but something different than red for a night out. And it's quite shocking. Next step: black. Ha ha ha... Oh and as you can see: Yves Saint Laurent. 50% discount. Yessss... ^^
The complete text of the non-response (with no signature by plaintiff Julian Robertons) follows:
-Salad
We are often impressed by Loki's development. I suspect that most parents are proud (even of the common things) like us. In the last couple days, two things impressed us. Mom and Loki were doing a shape puzzle. Loki said "oval" as he did that shape, and then "vierkant" or "square" as he did that one, etc. And then he says "trapezoid" as he does that one!(That is "trapezium" in NL.) I think we last said that word while doing the same puzzle several months ago.
Finally, what do you see? Focus on the small details. Are dead leaves or blades of grass poking up through the snow? Are there mice or deer tracks? Is a perfect feather lying at your feet? Is a nest visible in the bare tree branches?
Under my ironing board to the left is a pot (?) where I keep my freezer paper and rolled-up patterns waiting to be traced... some embroidery hoops... a bookshelf with my glue gun and glue related paraphernalia, sewing machine manuals and books, fabric paint, dye, and a basket on top with all of my needles and feet and whatnot.
Have a wonderful stampin' day!
One of the foundations of my personal spiritual belief is that we are all One. What that means is that we were all made by the same Creator; we share the same DNA; we are all the stuff of star-dust. Civil societies must operate in a cooperative collective, or they don’t survive. To be healthy, they cannot function with an “us” and “them” mentality. Last week I got to see that I too cherish my opinions. I judged the heck out of the woman who messaged me privately and I didn’t like the way it felt in my nervous system. I felt proud of the way the public conversation went, and recognized that the discourse would be good modeling for some of our leaders who are at each others throats because of their precious opinions.
LOVE THIS QUOTE from the KAISER COLLECTION
But am too afraid to hope for... more
64. Stolen: A Letter to My Captor Lucy Christopher
Among the biologists to whom he addressed this question, only one gave a response. Dr. Theodore Sargent “said that immortality would pose some problems:
Purpose of the Program
7. Leave a comment on each of the blogs letting them know they have been nominated.
"What makes Philip Dick more relevant to today is not necessarily the quality of his fantasy, but the complexity of it. And him. Philip Dick was as much an anti-hero as any of his characters. He's a counter-cultural hero whose personality was forged in the fifties, not the sixties. He was a champion of the drug culture who attempted to sell out friends and acquaintances to the FBI. He saw into people, but knew himself not at all."
So, my day didn’t start off as I had intended. I may have a bump in the road to get over. I could continue to beat myself up about it, but it’s not the end of the world. I think I’ll be kind to myself and go to lunch with a good friend!
*** Oh yeah, and a belated r.i.p. to newsman Mike Wallace, who had this to say in a 1967 CBS documentary:
05. Money 9:03
I met Patty Leidy, the book’s illustrator, through Facebook. I saw Patty’s cartoons and appreciated her sense of humor and her style. I messaged her about the idea.
Cause, that is HOW FUCKING SEIROUS I AM! If you bring me sufficient beyond reasonable evidence, that shows me your ideology and thoughts about black Africans are worth considering and that I need to change my mind, to reflect a more accurate reality: I WILL DO SO; I'D FUCKING LOVE TO DO SO; BUT ONLY ON GODDAMN FUCKING EVIDENCE, NOT LIES, NOT FUCKING 'HOPE' NOT FUCKING EMPTY FUCKING WORDS AND RHETORIC.
Guess where we're going for spring break?
Gilroy said about 65 per cent of the 215 commercial apple growers in Ontario have crop insurance but the disaster has the board approaching the provincial and federal governments for help under an agri-recovery program.
Next week Vedaste is in Brussels, so I have 10 days off. I plan to visit the genocide memorials at Nyamata and Ntarama, which are meant to be harrowing. Although I expect it to be a very upsetting experience I think it’s important. I’m also going to go to Butare and visit the national museum and university. Then on Thursday (at 5.45 no less!) I’m catching the 9 hour hour bus to Kampala to stay with Angela for a few days. I’m also going white water rafting at Jinja which I’m regarding with equal parts excitement and trepidation! Grade 5 is higher than anything I’ve done before and by all reports the chances of getting through without the raft flipping are next to none. (But I’m sure I’ll be fine Mum, Dad and Andy, and I checked my insurance covers it!) And hey, at least I’m not trying the bungee jumping!
“Good morning, agent Robertson. This is Michelle Parker.” Edith had never spoken to the head of the Birth department before, but it was not the time to be awed, honored, or nervous. “I apologize for the early hour, but I’ve been told you’re willing to step up into agent West’s position temporarily.”
It was warm enough to grill in Pennsyltucky this afternoon, and it’s going to get into the 70s this coming week.
B - Italian Omelets
On the last day, the alumni were joined by local leadership from the Ismaili community for a panel discussion entitled Interfaith versus Intra-faith Dialogue in Muslim, Christian and Jewish Communities. The Reverend Dr Karen Hamilton (General Secretary of the Canadian Council of Churches), Dr Nargis Virani (IIS Alumna and Assistant Professor of Arabic and Islamic Studies at the New School, USA), and Dr Barry Levy (Former Dean of Religious Studies, McGill University, Canada) spoke about their experiences of engaging in both interfaith and intra-faith dialogue.
“I cannot say if today at Mugello we can claim to have made up some ground, but in Barcelona, we will have more important updates and we hope that there, we can begin to close down the gap that separates us from the teams currently at the top,” added Alonso. “We have decided to favour development time in the wind tunnel rather than bringing forward all the new components to this test. Sure, it would be nice to be able to test all the updates on track first, but it is also nice that we can count on all the possible development potential for every single part. Barcelona will be a key moment in the season, but not a decisive one. It’s not a case that we will suddenly find ourselves back on pole position, because there is no magic button. We must start by no longer struggling to get through to Q3 and get closer to the top six, then continue with development in the following races, making a step forward in Monaco, Canada and Valencia also. That is the only way in which we can contemplate finding these seven or nine tenths – it’s hard to assess exactly how far off we are on the basis of the first races – which separate us from the leaders. Certainly, I am not denying that next weekend’s event is a significant one: we cannot allow ourselves to struggle to get into Q3 if we want to fight for the title.”
Talk about really pointless.
Being from New York, the only stadiums in the area are Citi Field, and Yankee Stadium, and they are both brand new. However even though they are beautiful stadiums, they do not have the great atmosphere around the park the way Fenway does. Surrounding both NY stadiums are auto shops, scrap yards, parking lots, subways, and the occasional low grade bar. Fenway has a more intimate and fun feeling around it. Located smack in the middle of the city, Fenway is surrounded by bars, hotels, restaurants and stores creating a lot of things for fans to do walking around the outside of the stadium.
For her tolerant opinions,
Can't wait for the tour.
Who is this King of glory?
There are a few negating Kanji and 無 is one that popped up in a mail I got recently from Japan so it stuck in my head. (The relevant sentence was 英語無しで書きます。(Eigo-nashi de kakimasu.) This was after I asked for mails in Japanese without English translation. Anyway, if you can remember this you will also be able to remember the one other regular Kanji that uses the radical too.
He saw the dark grassland. He saw the baobab tree in the corner, standing tall like some genie from the Arabian nights. Suddenly he saw something moving to his right. He was stunned in fear and shock the very next second.
* 3/4 oz. simple syrup*
An Example;
Tempeh, 1 pc cut into thin slices
And so, out of a strict curiosity, mixed with a bit of alarmist disposition, I decided to upgrade…
There are people to thank. Parents. Sibling. Spouse. Friends. Agent. Publisher. You know. The usual. I'll thank them if the damn thing ever wins anything.
~ Unload dishwasher, load with breakfast dishes
3. I am not a troll.
I recommend this to every person reading the review. Go pick it up!
Wrinkles should merely indicate where smiles have been. ~Mark Twain, Following the Equator
He spoke this morning about people going around saying they are the best.
It was further sealed the night I got a giant care package from the states and we pored over US Weekly and InTouch Magazines together while eating peanut butter sandwiches with bags of Cheetos washed down with giant glasses of milk.
BLISS in Russian means this.....
Natasha Romanoff: He killed 80 people in 2 days.
Design a standardized form for all medical reporting.
Don’t forget to check out the CCEE Stampers blog (goes live 12 AM EST) to see the rest of the creations the CCEE Stampers created this week. You can also see more details of their creations on their individual blogs:
In the Joseon era of Korea, Crown Prince Yi Gak's wife, the royal princess, is found floating in a lake. The prince is overwhelmed with sadness.
51. The Lookout
Not too long ago I came across a book that I knew would be helpful to me as a young pastor but didn’t buy it because it wasn’t something that I was going to need for a few years yet. One month later I found myself purchasing this same book and selecting the “one day shipping” box on Amazon [thank goodness we are prime members!]. What book was it that I foolishly put off buying? Conduct Gospel-Centered Funerals: Applying the Gospel at the Unique Challenges of Death by Brian Croft and Phil A. Newton. I was about to lead my first funeral and I was desperate for some practical and cross-centered wisdom from someone more experienced than I. How did this come about?
What a revelation: actually homeschooling gets more done than just talking about it.
And perhaps Thabo Mbeki kept quiet because he saw how easily what was happening in Zimbabwe could happen in South Africa, and lead to the break-up of the tripartite alliance. He preferred the Ronald Reagan approach of "constructive engagement".
And I was laughing and wishing I had a tape recorder. The more I tried to understand and take him seriously the more I giggled. Because I am 12. The more I giggled the more frustrated he became.
I guess I'm just saying we got up, did what we had to do and moved on with our day.
On director Tim Burton: “I feel as though he’s my brother. It’s a weird understanding, this kind of shorthand we have. I truly understand him, I think, just as well as anybody can. He certainly knows me as well as anybody can.” (The two previously worked together on Charlie and the Chocolate Factory, Edward Scissorhands, and Sweeney Todd: The Demon Barber of Fleet Street)
Done. Finished. Well almost. I still have to mulch tomorrow. But all the plants are in. In Howard County, the rule of thumb is don’t plant tomatoes until Mother’s Day. No frosts in the county and hopefully temps that will stay above fifty degrees.
Her immaculately tended plot is covered with an ornate marble surround and ornaments which Lily, 53, her husband Jeffrey, 52, and Angelene’s brother and sister Jeff and Dolly lovingly visit every day.
For one test, they had us stand with both arms extended straight out to the sides, and one leg extended straight out in front. They asked us to hold that pose for a minute, then extend the leg behind us in what my gymnastics coach would have called a scale, but which a yoga teacher might call something else. Everyone in the room, except me, dropped their leg and then raised it behind them, breaking from the one pose before taking up the other. I was the only one who combined the two poses. I simply kept my leg extended straight and swung it around to the side and then behind me in a smooth semi circle, parallel to the ground. It was a clean, effortless move, and I was surprised no one else had thought to do it.
I’d say Lili.
Luke 2:19-20, 33-35
Happy days! Just a few hours sleep and we'll be on our way.
* Creating a life by design rather than by chance
Nora Roberts. She manages to sway my emotions more than any other author, and she always leaves me feeling happy in the end. I also love how she portrays male characters! I’ve learned a lot from her writing.
I love this month series from Little House Needleworks, and I started buying the month series from Country Cottage Needleworks. Both of the series are so cute! And apparently I have a thing for month patterns :)
5. Urad dhal, ½ teaspoon.
The title of today's post is the opening of Wooden Heart in the original German and translates as "Got to go, got to go, got to leave this town …" an increasingly attractive option this morning, I have to confess.
What's in a name? If the knobbly, unyielding Quince was called something warm & fuzzy would it be more popular? Honey berry perhaps, for it's amazing fragrance, or Rose Fruit, after the pretty colour the flesh turns on cooking? Quince is hardly a head turner, but then in the raw, neither is the fruit. Cook it up however, and you have a wonderfully perfumed flesh, which also combines well with other fruit. Boring old apple sauce becomes something else altogether.
Anyhoo I have had some brilliant nights out, I keep putting in my dreads which I can now put in faster. It only takes me up to an hour
You tend to be on high alert. You are very aware of your surroundings. Yes.
We're not taking Spina Bifida lying down. We're not accepting what the "experts" tell us. We are not letting Spina Bifida define us.
All the fire and brimstone stuff has got me a little bit worried. Mark Twain is one to be remembered for he described God in not too pleasant terms. He claimed that the Christian Bible was a biography of God in which God is described not as what humanity expects and wants in a god. Mark’s describes God in Heb 10:30 terms: Vengeance is Mine.
"Ayan ka na naman! Kunwari wala ka na lang magawa!" V said, laughing. "But seriously, did you like it?"
8 It is better to trust in the Lord
What inspired you to write The Lady in the Tower?
“But how can that be, Abby?” Her best friend’s face looked splotchy beneath her fresh pleated kapp. “She and James had planned out all their visits to the aunts and uncles and–”
10 a.m. Cats found my puppy chow. Woof at them. They run away. This could be fun.
It is for many of the above reasons that we have seen the rise and growth of the online retail monolith Amazon. Amazon has come in for much criticism particularly over the past year among authors and publishers alike, and while I am not a fan of their strident and heavy handed business conglomerate tactics; who can blame them? The publishing industry has provided the platform for Amazon wanting to be ‘all things to all mankind’, excuse my tongue being firmly embedded in my cheek! Amazon want to be publisher, printer, distributor and wholesaler all rolled into one. True self publishers cast the first stone in a landmark change to the publishing industry decades ago by eliminating ‘the publisher’. While online sales of book formats still remains in its infancy, time and technology marches on to a point in the not too distant future when the traditional publisher as we know them now finally bolts the last door on their brick and mortar houses.
With some of my other projects like the Master Closet, I needed my space and didn't want the little guy's "help". With this, however, we were organizing his own toys, so I felt that it was important to for him take part in the process.
A more accurate and literal translation is this:
I smiled back and said that perhaps it was, although on the inside I didn’t really believe it.
Delusions and deluding
I used Close to my Heart's Art Philosophy cartridge to cut the base card, the background mat, and the shaped mats. I used pop dots to assemble the bunny scene on the mats.
from WWII onward.
“University Philippines Diliman may not be at par with NUS, but because we can speak English and think better than your university graduates (plus we only get meager salaries from multinationals….), they chose to hire us.”
Conference date: April 17-19, 2013
Rio Grande, Argentina
From back to front (which sounds wrong and gross, but that's *not* what we're talking about here):
The tag itself was from VERY heavy black cardstock. I added glimmer mist, and then sponged on some purple and green. Once I had all that done I VersaMarked it and then Clear Embossed it. It has a really cool effect in person. You can kind of see the swirly colors here, but not as well. The Cheshire Cat image was colored with RV62, 66, 69 and BV00, 01, 02, 04. Over the top of it I added Crystal Effects to make it more sturdy. The tag is layered and in the end I added these picks I found in the Wedding Area of Hobby Lobby. There is not as much difference in the purple on the tulle compared to the purple on the cat. Again - I NEED to work on my picture taking skills.SIGH.
“We’re delighted to lend our support to whatever this is, and urge readers of ITTODBTBIA bored of the same EEC rant recycled endless times to head over to the Hot Potatoes blog where they’ll find a link to the new podcast. It’s potatolicious! Whatever that means.”
While the beers are small and varied, there is a common element that can be found among them: quality. “We’re going to brew clean, balanced, easy drinking beers. Each batch has its own unique water profile. Each style has its own yeast strain.”
According to MarketScot CEO Richard Kerr, the results continue to show a slow and steady path towards rate increases in all segments.
No, just no. We’re not cave men. It’s not the Ice Ages. Nor do we live in Siberia. Killing an animal simply to wear it’s fur is not necessary, it’s deplorable. Skinning a frozen fox? NO. You want the authentic experience, then do it. Trap the fox YOURSELF, skin it alive YOURSELF (that’s how they do it in real life). Not so neat and tidy then, huh?
A few months before I was born, back in the early 1960s, my Dad met a stranger who was new to our small town. From the beginning, Dad was fascinated with this enchanting newcomer, and soon invited him to live with our family. The stranger was quickly accepted and was around to welcome me into the world a few months later. As I grew up, I never questioned his place in our family. Mum taught me to love the Word of God, and Dad taught me to obey it. But the stranger was our storyteller.
“And you, dear Princess. Never forget the last poem your Grandmother ever spoke!” she muttered to herself. These very words had stuck in her so strongly because they were part of a cue for her to come in that she had to remember from rehearsing the play in the Drama Club. She continued her quotation as she scratched away at the other markings on the bottle.
drawing to WIN!
On Friday night, my mother sat propped on pillows in Nana Hannah's bucket chair, the one covered in apricot and violet and wedgewood blue Henri Rousseau palms. I was going through her closet, pulling out sweaters, jeans, work shirts and she sat there sick, but smiling, sick, but at peace, and she said to me, "It's okay, after today, I won't need that" and I said, "You're really okay, aren't you?" and she smiled and said "I am. I'm really okay." Over and over I told her, "Nothing makes me happier than knowing that you are okay."
Temps: 156:12
Everything is Everything (9-930)(Gabriel Garzon Montano and friends)
Don’t just get a mortgage, KNOW your mortgage.
Can you even imagine?! The thought of no front door whatsoever is WAY worse than the thought of a glass front door, but we really wanted that new door installed. And...we're not the type to be able to just sit around and WAIT for things, so...I stopped doing my labor dance and sat on my rear all day long trying to NOT encourage labor to get here.
AD : Yes. Give me 1000′s.
8 Mint quoting Count Anton Wolfgang Von Faber-Castell, chairman-CEO of the 250-year-old stationery company that pencils will last longer than we imagine. In a digital world, where cutting costs in offices means stationery is the first thing to go and a paperless world is looking increasingly realistic, what is the future of stationery? “It will probably last longer than we believe,” says Count Anton. “The question is in what quantities. It was already my concern 30 years ago with the pencil business which, to my surprise, is stronger than ever. One of the reasons is because pencils, especially coloured, are needed for education, they don’t dry out, last forever and are environmentally friendly. “Globally, colour pencils are growing because of education and demand in developing countries. Children might start early with computers, but as we know from brain research, it’s important that children use their hands for motor development and mental skills. There was a dream of a paperless office, which has remained a dream. Where there is paper, there is the need for pencils. Colour, including artist pencils, will remain for 50-100 years because they have special features but in limited quantities.”
#3 - to create a homogenous mass - another big point. You want your individual ingredients to lose their sole identities to become one happy family.
Having been expelled, I wrote to Head Office requesting an appeal hearing, which I was entitled to. At least I would then have had the chance to put my case. But even this was denied to me. In fact the reason that I was given for my expulsion was that having resigned the whip I had in effect resigned from the Party, which is utter nonsense. But it seems that they were determined to get rid of me once and for all, come what may.
Just the other day, my husband asked me if I was happy. I answered quickly with a resounding "Yes!", and left befuddled by his inquiry. I thought I demonstrated qualities of a happy, joyful wife and mother. I mean, if you were to read the posts, it seems like all is perfectly wonderful.
I took the machine out, and selling the base as a table separately.
Meanwhile in the midst of trying to get the computer up, I did get a couple other things done. I hope you’re all having a good Saturday. Haven’t checked any of your blogs yet. If you don’t see me around here somewhere off and on though, it means the dumb internet isn’t working again. The company we’re with is unable to be contacted on the weekends too. I tried calling, and the message asked if I would like to leave a message for a technician who would call me back during normal business hours. So that would be Monday morning. The idea of all weekend without the internet seriously was freaking me out! Ha ha…and I have gone much longer than that in the past and survived just fine, but it is amazing how attached we can become to this means of communication.
The fundamental issue at the heart of this ordinance remains Private Property Rights, and the willingness, not to mention the questionable legality, of the electorate being allowed to vote those rights away based on less than credible evidence of necessity to do so. The propaganda disseminated in favor of surrendering those rights is both at once, disturbing that those rights are surrendered so easily, and fascinating to know that people can be convinced of nearly anything, no matter how fantastically unbelievable it may be. It would seem that, on the surface of this issue, the Former Attorney General and Secretary of State were not immune to the propaganda and were either deceived, were Negligent, or both.
Bake at 375 degrees for 30 minutes or until apples are soft.
One liter is close to a quart, and there are four quarts in a gallon: 1.69 x 4 = 6.76 Euros a gallon
who would choose the bad things
Wood from long vanished aromatic forest.
That child of mine was marched up to his room so quickly there was a vapor trail. And he stayed there while I cleaned up the mess and his sister watched me with interest from her rocker.
"Possibly from the close blades of a John Deere? Quite a low setting?"
Once the doctor came in, she asked a bunch of questions and then examined my head. "hhmmmmm Wow, how did you find that? That is a tumor, we need to get a better look at it" of course she went on to explain that there many different types of tumors and some are absolutely NOTHING and others are something! From that point until now has been a complete roller coaster ride! After some frustrating moments with the Military Clinic (frustration and military clinic are often synonymous) I was able to get in for an MRI. Now, I wait!
Sophia added feathers, but only two, and only to one side of her alien's head.
* The Jamaica Chamber of Commerce Building at 89-31 161st Street was completed in 1929 and “is a reminder of an important moment in the economic development history of Jamaica,” the landmarks commission’s chairman, Robert B. Tierney, said in a statement.
Recommended for fans of love triangles that make choosing the “right” romantic pair far more difficult than it should be; bonus for those who enjoy musical elements credibly tossed into their dramas.
But government attorneys argued in court papers last week that the case ought to be converted to a Chapter 7. According to those filings, the conversion would allow for the appointment of a trustee to "make an independent and true fiduciary judgment" about millions of dollars in fees for bankruptcy professionals.
And the heat of the sun on a summers day.
■Farmer’s Neighbor #3
4. Pulling out of Iraq: “I was in the military and I know we don’t have any business being there. Afghanistan was harboring terrorists, but Iraq wasn’t. The Middle East is totally blowing up now. Getting the troops out of Iraq is the best thing about 2010.” -Demming, NM—Truck Terminal
For those of you following along at home, the question wasn’t the accuracy of Semnani’s quoting of Simeone. It was the accuracy, or lack thereof, of what she was saying about what Simeone said. So I responded:
a boy looks at a girl, and a girl looks like a pony
Saturated with clichés
Further indications of the topics glanced at in the Essays included in Reflections on Slavery and the Constitution are provided in the following Index prepared for that volume by George Anastaplo in December 2011:
Strong eyes, fine limbs, haughty athletes,
-IR35 disputes
The last week I have gotten sicker with most likely pneumonia in the left side and I'm taking this one day to do nothing. Nothing. I mean nothing but rest, take meds, and catch up on all the emails. I am planning to get an xray tomorrow as I have been really sick this week.
If we're going to start judging the presidential candidates based on their youth, than I suppose President Obama's Muslim background, college transcripts, former drug use, idolizing of Malcom X and bullying of a girl are now also fair game.
2010.09.01 Thailand Yala 1 0 A 49-year-old security worker is shot to death as he is riding home from work.
We enjoy sitting outside when the temperature isn't too high. We have lots of hummingbirds that keep us entertained and quail that feed on the bird block just a few feet away. And my garden... well...
The second choice is God’s.
Isn’t it all about control? If I text you, I keep it short, way short. Telegraphic, in fact. (Remember those old-fashioned things, telegrams? How many black-and-white movies’ plots hinged on a well-timed telegram?)
Geo-Puzzles
Don’t miss part two of our interview with Dr. Cockerill, in which he talks about the authorship of Hebrews and discusses the epistle’s unique contributions to Christian theology.
West Coast taste on a Extra Special or Strong Bitter. Starts off with a nice amber color and smells of both hops and malt. I was expecting something that was more bitter than it was, but the malt really comes through to sweeten up and to smooth out that bitter flavor.
TRI/Princeton to Hold Fifth International Conference on Applied Hair ScienceConference Organizers Call for Abstracts and Sponsors
“So it was proposed that those who wished should band themselves together in a purely voluntary organization called ‘the Comrades of the Quiet Hour.’ The name was chosen rather than the similar name of ‘The Morning Watch’ in order to give the utmost freedom as to the time which should be devoted to meditation and personal communion with God, though the morning was strongly recommended. Those who became “comrades” agreed to spend fifteen minutes a day not merely in Bible-reading and petition, but in genuine personal communion with the Unseen. . . . Quiet Hour literature began to abound; ‘Quiet Hours’ led by some of the most eminent Christians in the land began to be held in connection with the conventions both State and national. Now more than 40,000 have been definitely enrolled. . .” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, p. 357).
(Note: For more information on the 12Gbps SAS interface, see the Denali Memory Report blog post from last month: “Cadence adds 12Gbps SAS and NVM Express verification IP to its VIP catalog”)
And here we are. The beginning of another edition of my Monday Mumbling. I am ready for another exciting Monday Night RAW, and I am hoping that the twists, turns, and surprises continue. I would, however, be remiss if I did not mention that today is Owen Hart’s birthday. Owen would have been 47 today, and even though I did not know him, and can not even pretend to understand the pain and loss his family must feel, I miss him. Owen not only represented what professional wrestling should be, he was loved by everyone. Happy Birthday, King of Harts! Now that I have paid my small tribute, it is time to get on with the show.
However, many fall by the wayside, into the doldrums of failure! Like the Nimitz’ abundance of technology and hardware, life’s situations are becoming more challenging and complex as we steam ahead.
in LA
15. Little Willie John - Leave My Kitten Alone
Apparently a good number of people--well, most likely men--have not been following those instructions.
He huffed, putting the gun down.
You need to be resilient, robust, and a little bit more optimistic than most. More importantly, you also need to stick up for yourself. Be a force of nature. Demand the most out of your experiences. Appreciate the people who you meet but don’t get bent out of shape if some bother you (its not a popularity contest). This is also applicable to long-term life lessons, but is particularly true when traveling. It is those who greet challenges head on, who move on when things don’t go the way they were planned, and who pick themselves up to greet each new day with abundant energy, spunkiness, and passion that truly know how to travel right.
Thanks to all who participated in this blog hop......
My question is as follows:
I found myself singing this. Then searching for it. Then weeping silently at my desk, tears of joy splashing onto my keyboard.
"You will be part of conversations and workshops that shape the future of marketing."Me? I'm gonna shape the future of marketing? With conversations and workshops? Little ol' me?
The story of France after the Revolution and the upheaval that Napoleon caused became much a part of Désirée’s story, and was a fantastic backdrop to the heartwarming relationship Désirée had with her husband Jean-Baptiste Bernadotte. The writing style was quick and easy to understand and not dated to its original fifties publication which is surprising. Not a literary masterpiece but just a fantastic story of an otherwise forgotten lady (who is not depicted well on Wikipedia), I am so glad that Sourcebooks Landmark has reissued the tale fifty years after its first printing. Timeless and epic are true adjectives even though I cannot fully explain the draw that the story had for me, it is just one of those novels that will be unforgettable. Annemarie Selinko dramatically relates the life of Désirée, her family, and the Bonapartes though with a blunt matter of factness that tugged at my heartstrings which showed Désirée had sacrificed much for her beliefs of the Rights of Man, but seemingly with no regrets.
"Mr and Mrs Odic-Table...and their son Perry"
Every guest gets a chance to ask one question.
Calories 127.3
There was an American T.V. drama called Big Love. As the name suggests, the male lead in the show has a big heart and big family. The husband practices polygamy and he has 4 wives.
I realize that it may not be realistic to eat organic food 100% of the time. But at least now you have some food for thought (J). My experience is that it is something that you must grow into. What has worked for my family is a commitment to organic food 25% of the time. Once you can prove to yourself that you can feel the difference than you can grow into eating organic food more often.
So proud of the team I am here with. They have fully embraced New Orleans and have been very adventurous with meals! Our first dinner, at Oceana, everyone ordered something very New Orleans…there was a lot of gumbo and Alligator at the table!
11:00 am Pumped at my desk - thank goodness for office doors!
::Sophie with her friend Emily::
You will get to see most of the new images today as you sit back and enjoy our MARCH Krafty Hop! If you want to start from the beginning, just head over to the Kraftin’ Kimmie Challenge Blog!
This is the fourth competition of Jason's I've entered and with each one I have gained insight and learned so much from the other entrants. And with each one I got better. In the last competition, Ascension, I got an honourable mention which for me felt like being shortlisted for the Booker!!! This time around my excitement went into the red zone when I diligently tuned in at 5pm yesterday (local time - noon EST) to find that I got 4th place in the competition. Theeeeen I read further down and blow me if I didn't win the Reader's Choice Award. Oh My Giddy Aunt! I immediately went into "Oscar" mode and started thanking the world. I almost went into Sally Field "YOU LIKE ME" mode, (as we share a birthday I have to blame the stars for that impulse) but 20 years of living in England has taught me something about restraint. Instead I went on Facebook and screamed OMG!OMG!OMG! at the world. Much classier.
Made this for sale as a baby shower gift. The customer wanted a baby boy afghan. I found THIS pattern and thought it would be perfect....a nice pattern without being too much. When I finished the basic ghan, I thought it needed something so I thought about it and got the idea of adding the bug appliques and the lines to represent their flying. The embroidery took time but it really came out great. I think the new mom will appreciate it.
Here is the video for "Somebody That I Used To Know". It's possibly not safe for work, depending on who can see your monitor. They never actually show anything, but it looks like they're going to. Stick with it, the song really picks up around minute 3:00. And if there's anything I like more than hand claps & high hats, it's a background vocal. I love this song!
9. Bicycling gives you muscles.
Ah, summer.
It’s always the same to me, strangers become friends
1 l boiling water or chicken stock
Why? Because you could
"Will needs more than I have to give." Their dad frowned. "Sam, you have to take him. If you don't, we won't get to Fletching. Abby, you too."
I finally decided that I just had to give up on the mystery and let it go. Sort of. . .
I did my bit of culture yesterday by visiting the RAF Museum at Hendon. A must for a buff like me, though I have been before. Later I had intended that we follow a pub crawl around the St Paul's area and accordingly I met E in the Bell,down the side of Cannon St station. It is a spartan little boozer, still tricked out as a Courage pub and quite likeable. After work it was full, though I found a seat beside two businessmen and eavesdropped on a long tedious discussion about conservatories. Such is pub life. Harvey's Bitter was my choice, though frankly it did little for me. The choice (all brown) did less for E, who declined a drink.
(6) Sarah Smith
Series: Yes, #2
Here is a photo of both inside & lid. I am very happy with the way this exploding box turned out & I hope my Mum like it (sure she will).
Both Hermione and Emma have blossomed into beautiful young ladies in the decade since Harry Potter and the Sorcerer’s Stone first hit theaters. Now that the fantasy saga is drawing to an end with Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows 2, let’s have a quick glance at some of the most important turning points of Hermione’s life, and ask: How do we get the look?
My parents came and my other Sister, Sallie, whose Birthday it was, too! For her birthday, I made her the God Mother and gave her her first nephew, ever. She was in the middle of her 17th birthday party and had to leave it early to come to the hospital. We were all so excited!
 Etc.
That’s bad enough, but Judge Jones said that until recently, all 88 court employees had the ability to log into a computer system to erase tickets and fines and could use that ability to help out family and friends.
He has recommended disciplinary action and a tightening of government procurement systems.
Black Diamond Brewing - This beer is mostly about the yeast and spices used - a White Labs Saison Yeast blend allowed to ferment warm in a base of Pilsner, wheat, aromatic, Munich and Crystal malts, with some turbinado sugar to lighten the mouthfeel. Big aromatic spices hail from cardamom seeds and ginger ground at the brewery along with both bitter and sweet orange peel added in the last 10 minutes of the boil.
3. Closed captioning can’t be viewed when the video enters full screen. You’re better off hitting Ctrl and + (or Command and + on MACs) to enlarge your video screen.
St. Augustine tells us that faith is given to us as a sacred trust. It must be protected. It must be developed. It must be allowed to grow.
Martin continues to play in a couple of bands, although I understand the free orange has been knocked on the head.
--Chris Owens (opponent of AY)
Buster Posey SFG Y 5
My momma and I went to JoAnn's today and I picked up a new Cupcake decorating book. I'm so eager to use some of their ideas!
Thank you to all those who came to visit me - your visits and words are very much appreciated and keep me going. Also, thanks to anyone who became a follower as a result - I love to see a new face in my followers box, so thank you and welcome.
In 2011 McLaren were not afraid to try a radical sidepod set up, This was the “U” shaped sidepod, with the angled inlet shape creating channel in the upper section of sidepod (About the MP4-26 “U” shaped sidepods). This year the team have adopted more typical sidepod format, with high\wide sidepod inlets and steep undercut beneath. I got to ask Tim Goss about this:
Megamind comes from a troubled background. He was exposed to a rough, morally-challenged crowd in his young life. His role models directly influenced his decision to move to the dark side. Rejected by his peers at every turn, is it any wonder Megamind grew up to take vengeance on those who had mistreated him and judged him.
The winner will get the chance to choose FOUR images of their choice. You will be totally stuck for choice I can tell you. Melissa has also kindly provided images for some of the DT and our GD to use.
While some folks seem to know it well
We did take a little bit of a break this week...the kids had won some gift cards to a local arcade/sports complex, so we went there for a couple hours of batting cages, mini-bowling, inflatables and other fun arcade games.
There are numerous scriptures in both the Old and New Testament that support the doctrine of the trinity, but I want to focus on just a few today, along with the train of thought that’s been going through my mind the past few days.
Dunhill DS-50049
Putnam, R. D. (2000). Bowling alone: The collapse and revival of American community. New York: Simon & Schuster.
To avoid a gut reaction to particular names, let me present the situation to you without names – as a case study, if you like – so that you can see it in its full absurdity.
Jack/Sam
I often wonder what will become of the land as we descendents branch further away. Still cloaked in early 20th Century beech trees, mosses, jonquil patches and magnolia groves, it would be a shame for future generations of Rowland descendents to miss out on experiencing these timeless treasures.
Z: Let's go with statistical analysis on that one.
"It’s been a rough couple of years for bands tied to folk-tronica. The genre has become contemporary easy listening built to soundtrack an overpriced sushi dinner in a chic hotel restaurant, or perhaps music that gets drowned out by the roar of a Starbucks frother. Critical respect has been lagging, but a new bright spot has appeared in Hundred Waters.
A Short Series of Sermons on God’s Grace
I would like to start by showing you a comparison in rolled flowers. I have started with the following paper sizes. I like making small rolled flowers and find that the 1 inch squared are quite nice and delicate. So start out with a squared piece of paper.
* Only known time played live
I realised long ago that parenthood ain't easy but these few days have just been super challenging. I think it doesn't matter if you have 3 kids or 13, parenting is one tough job. Well, hubby and I have 16 more years to perfect this skill with Alden. One day, I'm sure we'll get it right.
Compared with nonmenthol smokers, menthol smokers age 50+ years had a significantly lower risk of dying from lung cancer (HR = 0.59, 95% Confidence Interval, CI = 0.37 – 0.95). The lower risk for menthol smokers was also seen at all ages (HR = 0.69), in both men and women (HR = 0.71 and 0.70 respectively), and especially in blacks (HR = 0.41). This indicates that the results were consistent across many smaller subgroups of smokers, although the HRs were not significant because of the smaller numbers.
We also have the light of life. We are told in Matthew 5:14-15, we “are the light of the world. A city on a hill cannot be hidden. Neither do people light a lamp and put it under a bowl. Instead they put it on a stand, and it gives light to everyone in the house.”
Preheat oven to 375 degrees
Seems like when I teach the NRA Basic Pistol course and we get to the non-NRA part about Ohio Concealed Carry and Self-Defense law, we look at the State of Ohio's thoughts on legal use of a gun for self-defense, castle-doctrine, and I'd bet that a barrel of lawyers, judges, and prosecutors couldn't come to a consensus on almost any part of it at any given time - PRIOR - to someone drawing their gun.
Tacoma, Washington and Victoria, BC
Day workers in paint-spattered souls,
Fleur de Sel salt – to taste
The Sense of an Ending by Julian Barnes
This is a free event!
The bull is looking on. Is that sympathy?
I should tell you that I’ve already been published in my third grade newspaper, so I’ll want the “royal treatment” when it comes to royalties. We can go over all that when I meat you in person. Yule love how punny I am.
So that was my abandoned post. What do you all think about minimalism?
I'm a lizard in a scaly fucking disguise; I've been my own contradiction,
the litter bag landing on top of me.
Although I am tempted to colour the butterfly, I quite like the idea of the reversal of colour so that it is the background that is colourful and the butterfly is monochrome.
Or maybe it’s because, aside from Pink, Orchids and Ermine doesn’t feel that special. The direction is fine, and Moore’s supporting cast is able to a man, but so what? This movie's comic template is so basic it predates Shakespeare.
With harsh Winter weather like extreme cold and high winds comes a chance of power failure. If you have not backed up your data recently, do it now! It’s a best practice to back up all of your systems regularly and store a copy of the data off site.
As for policy officials (similar to what I used to be), in general they LOVE getting correspondence like this. (My view is that any official who doesn’t is in the wrong job). If anything, it shows that someone is taking an interest in your policy area – even though it might be a view contrary to that of your minister. Having a set of well-researched and challenging questions I think makes the job of a policy officer worth doing. There’s little worse than having to deal with a poorly-researched rant where you have to use a microscope to try and identify the question being asked.
If you live in California where you are restricted to 10 round magazines, then maybe you should move. If you live in Illinois, NYC, or DC, then you should definitely move. If you live on Airstrip One (formerly Britain) where essentially only shotguns may be owned then adjust accordingly. If you live in Switzerland you probably already know how to shoot and have excellent equipment. Everyone should know and abide by their local gun laws, no matter how Draconian, illogical, and unconstitutional they may be. These laws are for your protection/sarc.
So what made Aaron and his sons good enough for God? It was not the symbol, but the reality in Christ. The bull by itself meant nothing to God. As God said in Isaiah 1:11, “I have no pleasure in the blood of bulls and lambs and goats.” Aaron and his sons were good enough for God only because connected them to Christ, the sacrifice God would make to take their sins away.
Z Italy
The lifeguard has saved the year, Playa Chisme’s first
"I am endlessly fascinated by people, places, and things and consider it a privilege and a challenge to capture some aspect of their essence on canvas. I work toward ‘painterly realism’; good drawing and composition, rendered with strong natural color, in such a way that you can still ‘sense’ or ‘feel’ the paint. The effect of this process is that the subject begins to artfully reveal itself to me and hopefully, the viewer."
The name of the death-cold maid.
Why do a reality show?
To take it at God's value, but pass by
So one more week. The Gallery will return with a new theme - and the ONE HUNDREDTH anniversary! on Friday, May 11.
Engh's up-close look at power relationships through the character of Arslan and the dramatic changes he engenders is not free of flaws. Some might find the local/personal nature of the story to be underwhelming because so much is lost in the "fog" of events elsewhere that might seem more appealing to them. Others might find the messages contained within the narrative to be unappealing and unconvincing because they are not argued for as much as presented as being fait accompli. Certainly some will not experience that "seduction" which follows the "rape." But for others, Arslan is a moving, powerful work because it forces the reader to reconsider his or her own assumptions about how power relationships work and whether or not one might be willing to be an accomplice in the subversion of ideals once held to be steadfast and true. For those readers, Arslan will be a true masterwork that will resonate with them long after the initial read is complete and after re-reads are done in coming years.
It is also a useful method if the surroundings are likely to be included in the interview. Because the camera operator is so mobile, (s)he can move around and show objects and scenery as they are talked about.
It all started back on 2011-06-17 when I wrote a post entitled A Recession indicator has been triggered . This was not just an important predictive event but also an important step in my own understanding. The fact is that for some months now I have been publishing a series of posts called "Recession Indicators". What happened was that my own study of real interest rates seemed to prove conclusively that whenever real 10 year bond rates (10 year bond rates minus inflation) went negative, a recession was inevitable. This is what I said:
Nonetheless, she is my boss, and if she feels I'm lacking I need to take care of it.
If we are to move forward, it’s sometimes necessary to burn our bridges from the past.
The 10th Circuit Court of Appeals in March upheld the NRC’s decision that HRI does not have to clean up existing Cold War-era radioactive waste on its Churchrock Section 17 property, which includes the abandoned Old Church Rock Mine. Existing radioactive contamination is nine to 15 times the regulatory limit, according to court documents.
“Like potatoes and chicken?”
We went to two of the Veggie Heaven restaurants to see how they compare. While all of them are vegan, only one of the restaurants, the Teaneck location, is actually under Kosher supervision. However many of their cooking condiments and sauces either are made in the US and are kosher certified or come from Israel. In order to be truly vegan, no eggs are used in any of the preparations, including the noodles.
My spinach salad as-is. Isn’t it lovely? Reasonable amounts of goat cheese, bacon, and sun dried tomatoes gave it enough flavor that no dressing was needed. I happily ate all of the spinach but could only finish half of the chicken and goodies mix, clocking in on MyPlate at 385 calories and 30+ grams of protein. I only wish salads at more restaurants were as easy to order as this one.
About 15 minutes after the collision, she developed a list to port and was distinctly down by the head.
Preheat oven to 325 degrees for filling.
1B. Media and the City – TEL 238
Ps. If you are looking for a great book to read aloud to the family, we would highly recommend “Strawberry Girl” by Lois Lenski. This book was my favorite as a child growing up and I still love it today. It is a fictional story about a family back in the late 1800’s, moving from their home in North Carolina to an old farm in central Florida and growing strawberries as their main cash crop. Full of ole’ timey adventure and farming experiences, it captures the Old South and it’s culture perfectly. If the “Little House” books are on your favorite reading list, you’ll love reading “Strawberry Girl”!
From Germany, Finance Minister Wolfgang Schäuble offered his support for Spain by criticizing the S&P ratings move. He said it undermined efforts by the Spanish government to overhaul its finances. “The decision makes a situation that’s already critical even more critical,” Mr. Schäuble told Germany’s WDR radio.
Ok, you know by now that your mother is a complete geek. It’s no secret, I’m sure. That having been said, I’m going to share with you an excerpt from a book written by one of my all time favorite writers. Dr. Maya Angelou is a champion of driving out prejudice. She is a feminist, a civil rights activist, and one of the most talented authoresses of the 20th and 21st centuries. Her book, I Know Why the Caged Bird Sings, was one of the most beautifully written memoirs I’ve ever read. Someday I hope you’ll get around to reading it too. This is the foreward of another one of her books, Letters to My Daughter. I find in it some of the words I’m not quite eloquent enough to write to you.
Beautiful classical music filled the room, perfectly synchronized to the images that moved up and down each wall, and faded into the next. This was not your traditional art exhibit, it was more than an installation, it was an experience. Over 3,00o different images covered the walls, columns and even the ceiling, allowing the viewer to feel completely immersed in the vivid colors and vibrant images of Van Gogh’s work. It was absolutely captivating and a wonderful way to immerse oneself into the art and world of Vincent Van Gogh.
bear firearms, and the most basic principles of our criminal code!
Lugging laundry is not a great way to start your Monday! Thankfully the washing machines were back up and running in no time. Up next week is more plumbing and hopefully the back of the house getting sealed! Watch this space ….
We know it's in the genes. We know we need to do something. I am hoping that with the help of my family we can start to make some real changes. The buddy system really worked out yesterday when my sister e-mailed to say she used twelve points for breakfast and I shared with her some ideas for a five point breakfast that worked for me. Those little tips and tricks are what we need so we don't feel like we're stranded alone on an island.
What Star Trek fanfic writers did with the aired universe introduced ROMANCE in various forms and transformed the entire field of science fiction, which eventually spat out all that ‘stuff’ and created the genre now known as “Fantasy” (which did not exist prior to Star Trek fan writers entering prof fiction arenas.).
And now, I’m sitting here thinking how un-random life is in some ways. How very God-like life plays itself out. And how, in a time I needed Him, He put a hand on my shoulder and said ‘I’m watching. I’ve got you covered.’
How exciting is this?!?@?@
For more information about radiation, visit the web sites listed below.
One of my favorite bands as a young, surly teen was Siouxsie and the Banshees, whose front-woman Siouxsie Sioux was a gothic chantress who howled like a mythological siren—luring you with her tales of travel and woe. So when I came upon Elliot O’Donnell’s book about banshees I simply had to dust off the old vinyl (for you youngins’ whose main experience with vinyl is the sheath you keep your iPod touch in, I am referring to a vinyl record) and paint on some heavy eyeliner so I could have a good ol’ fashion Banshee Bash.
Ran-Hanuel didn’t say anything else to her as they drove home, which Micha was thankful for.
Hello, friends! I hope you've all had a restful Sabbath. I enjoy being able to take a break from my weekly cares and spending time with friends and family at church and at home every Sunday. :)
(This is how math gets applied in real life; a kid needs time and enough boredom to resort to making mini-envelopes to send letters to her stuffed animals.)
Sri Badrinath Dham is the most important of the four sites of Char Dham. It is in the Garhwal hills, on the banks of the Alaknanda River. With the splendid Neelkanth Mountains as the backdrop, Badrinath becomes even more wonderful place to visit.
So............here is mine now!
FLAG OFFICERS.
Also, his cousins, the banana slugs. Ew, yuck. I watched where I was going - those are gross to step on!
promotion and national honour!
A foreign national may be mislead by this professional and legal sounding title that resemble titles familiar to him from home and think he is dealing with an authorized legal advisor, when in fact, he is not.
To say that I have embraced a new direction is quite understated. I feel motivated and energised. I love it!!
Right after that the person who I was supposed to be working with for the household surveys cancelled because she is really busy with finals. I ended up going with a friend of one of the Vietnamese girls who is trying to improve her English. The surveys weren’t all together great. A lot of people didn’t want to talk or didn’t have the time to talk. Also, we went out during the hottest part of the day and a lot of people were sleeping. It was over 40 today.
‘‘I knew that we were in trouble then,’’ he said about their manager’s death, in an interview some years later. ‘‘I didn’t really have any misconceptions about our ability to do anything other than play music. I was scared. I thought we’ve had it now’.’’
Shomei Tomatsu (1 gelatin silver print and 1 book, 1961, 1966)
In addition, so far as I can tell by the few glances I have seen of this organization around my neighborhood, delivery is done by bicycle and by foot.
So then a new ad came into rotation. "Don't you wish you could just make some things disappear?" a young woman in club wear asks, as a rat-like man with an open-to-the-sternum disco shirt seems to sniff at her from behind. She flashes him a disgusted look and he pops in a familiar cgi dust effect that sets her hair swishing playfully at the camera. She then walks toward us with swinging hips as she enumerates the virtues of the particular tampon she's trying to sell us. Across the room, a nonthreatiningly normal looking boy is being chatted up by two women you don't really see well before our off-screen heroine presumably splatters them out of existence with the sheer, horrible force of the obliteration power this new tampon has granted her. She then skips up and begins a happy conversation we can only assume he's smiling and nodding along to out of fear for not only his life, but his very physical existence.
1-2 onions
Price: $65+
#108
Ok Hope you continue to enjoy this 1st Monday of 2012.
Indeed this is the true gift of Andrew’s music. Aside from the precision of his musical talent, which is flawless and professional, placing his work in a completely different category from most new age music, he is truly a channel for something “other”. An other that one cannot but think of as belonging to the highest of dimensional realms. A pure consciousness that lives beyond the worlds and which touches and transforms. This higher dimensional presence is in all of Andrew’s work, but is particularly visible here and it’s an honor to be held in this space for the duration of this musical journey. Thank you Andrew for being the conduit to such perfection and healing. This album is an opening and an initiation. A true beauty to behold.
Cover, reduce heat to medium low, and simmer for 8-12 minutes, or until greens are wilted and sauce has thickened, stirring occasionally.
On Wednesday the Pennsylvania Senate passed SB 1466, the General Appropriations Act, which includes the full restoration of funding to the State System of Higher Education. The bill passed 39-8, and now goes to the House of Representatives for consideration.
Devin Underwood (Drexon Field
CULLINAN: A 26-y.o. rehabilitation worker found murdered in his home. Five black attackers arrested in possession of his vehicle.
WordPress.Com, Blogs that I follow…
But, the one makeup tool I don't think I could live without is my EYELASH CURLER! I curl my lashes everyday before putting on mascara and it makes the hugest difference in opening up my eyes. I HATE it when I go out of town and forget it. I need to buy a second one to put in my travel case so I'm never home without it. Ha!
That sandwich was my ultimate joy of March 29, 2012.
It was so hard to see it all go...but I had to be realistic and just let go!
2 stars....
A few months ago, dear husband and I got into an argument, of no importance what-so-ever. Except that it was. He became so furious that he wouldn't let me leave. I tried. I was just going to go to work, and since he was so upset, I decided to take the girls to the sitter. He wouldn't let us leave.
yellow onions
HAPPY GROUNDHOG DAY. Longer winter my booty its like 90 degrees & more humid than the rainforest outside. I don't think we have even had a straight WEEK of winter weather. I am ready to head to Park City, Utah on my ski trip to actually see some snow since that is foreign here. Oh & apparently it's free chicken biscuit day at Chick-fil-a because the groundhog saw his shadow haha. I also heard on the radio yesterday that someone had the opportunity on winning a free chicken biscuit every day for an entire year. Holy moly. I love me some Chick-fil-a but let's be real. Everyday?? That person will probably end up hating it before the year is over plus the nuggets are way better.
“PureView has completely raised the bar on imaging performance for the whole smartphone industry – and Nokia is not stopping here. We’re going to carry on developing PureView for our future smartphones in ways that will again revolutionize the imaging experience.”
E = Enthusiasm
I am convinced that God is trying to teach me patience.....WOWSA~~~Grant me serenity!!!!!!
While Paul was a free man, he willingly gave to the needs of others. He said in 2 Corinthians 12:15, “I will very gladly spend and be spent for you.” He set the example in giving to the needs of others. This is also seen 1 Corinthians 16:1 as the Lord laid on his heart the plight of the believers in Jerusalem. He wrote to these people who were reluctant to give, “Now concerning the collection for the saints, as I have given order to the churches in Galatia, even so do ye.”
for someone like you to remain on side
And then a heaven sent line slices through the cosmos and makes me smile!
And instead of being stupidly hopeful right now, I’m legitimately hopeless. I don’t think he’ll contact me again. I think this will be the exact same situation as what happened with JJ and since I’ve quit the initiating, it’ll fade in to nothing. It’s just disappointing when I’ve been interested in both people and Magnum actually seemed interested in me too, but apparently not.
She had her way and everybody had their own, but you can ask anybody around and they'll tell you it was the best they've ever known.
But seriously, it helps that these three things all draw on common skill sets. For example, principles of powerful story-telling are important for a pastor, lawyer and (obviously) writer. I’m a little ADHD and like being able to go from one thing to another. It’s like crop rotation—keeps things fresh. And, to be honest, writing is more like relaxation for me than a job. It gives me a break from the pressures of the other “real life” jobs and lets me go into a world where I get to control things! (aka “God complex”)
"He thinks the EEG and resulting catatonia result from acute anxiety overload. He's noted that only the most primitive areas of her brain are involved. Take a look at the PET scan."
i) your CV
Ajay Gehi as Neeraj Grover
Masada String Trio—“50th Birthday Celebration”
I have three questions.
In her heroine, Ai Ling, Cindy has created a strong yet well balanced main character. Yes, Ai Ling is strong-minded and has unexpected powers but her feelings, her fears and hopes also give her a vulnerability which is infinitely relatable.
my party! Mostly because she let me
They all look so proud.
Dust the angles with ground cinnamon and icing sugar while they are still hot from the oven and surrender to the X’mas Spirit!
Wishing you happy spring plans for your garden!
1. To hold fast or adhere to something, as by grasping, sticking, embracing, or entwining: clung to the rope to keep from falling; fabrics that cling to the body.
If you go for an older Jetta TDI, before the model disappeared for a few years, you can spend much less–a 2006 model will cost you around $10,000-$11,000.
OMG...head is spinning. I gotta get this worked out. I'll take any suggestions, ideas, or thoughts that you guys have. Clearly, I need help!
He laments the changes he made to please his growing audience, while still catering to that audience. Crowd pleasing singles like “Change Clothes” though are tempered with the hard-hitting “Dirt Off Your Shoulder”, a masterpiece of the highest order. Over a driving staccato Timbaland beat, the King of New York dismisses his critics with a simple gesture. If you’re feeling like a pimp, go brush your shoulders off. ( Yes, Jay’s frequent use of the n-word does cause my bleeding liberal heart grief, but I cannot dictate what this man says, just how I interpret it.)
If you can help, please contact me:
Make sure you allow pepperoni roll to cool completely before serving.
Now let's take a look at where a girl like Belle might live.
“I don’t want them banished, I just think that they shouldn’t be classics,” said Ty.
In less than a day, I will be seeing my family! Wheee! Updates on food and family will be coming are forthcoming.
My oldest son just graduated from college with a BFA and used artist’s tape to secure the gift wrap. No ribbon needed. In the box was a round ornament from East Carolina University. (I wonder what the wrapping would have looked like without the square box.) Er, yes, you read that right. This gift was wrapped by a college graduate.
Factor B black ?
In a shelter with others who long for a home.
There where the summer lilies blow.
The actors grateful for the time at their best
Quinton McCottrell vs Darren Jacoby
Stop laughing at the back there.....
What I’ve discovered by being a stay at home mom of two is that I get no respect. (Now I know exactly what comedian Rodney Dangerfield meant.) I’ve often wondered if I got a job out of the house and I was gone fifty hours a week, making really good money. if my family—-my kids, my husband if they would respect me for making money, having a brand new car in the driveway, a huge house on a big lot, and everything else that goes with that.
The Que Fresco restaurant at Zamas is renowned as one of the best in eastern Mexico, using the freshest local products for dishes like seafood tacos.
whatcha think?
The defiance of Húrin Thalion is a great deed; and though Morgoth slay the doer he cannot make the deed not to have been. Even the Lords of the West will honour it; and is it not written into the history of Arda, which neither Morgoth nor Manwë can unwrite?[8]
I don't always maintain this level of thinking. Often I succumb to the pressures of classroom management and parent expectations. At times, I'm a slave to the minutes on the clock, finishing the project, encouraging the kids along.
To remember what I`d seen,
· Yelling “Wake up, Jeff!” whenever the loveable Purple Wiggle falls asleep onstage.
Automatic Bid: Ohio Valley Conference Champions
Cuts into 8-10 slices
This chapter fully analyzes Purcell’s Golden Sonata (the first movement). It doesn’t conform to any sonata stereotypes and gives fewer clues than other short sonatas. He looks at harmony first, and tries to define the form of the piece. LaRue argues that the cadence in bars 11-12 is stronger and more structurally defining than the cadence in bars 16-17 because 1) the first cadence climaxes in a stable section in the dominant, whereas the second is a smooth transition from minor to major; 2) that cadence forms a line of demarcation between two types of rhythmic and contrapuntal texture; and 3) the first cadence produces a major thematic change.
9. Tan leather bag (Oasis 2006)
That’s the stuff life was made of growing up: Life’s simple pleasures.
Storey turns things over thoroughly, viewing them as prisms. The range of examples he works through is appreciated. Taken together they explain how we can go in any historical direction, making different sized leaps, from the 1960s to the 1990s, or the 1880s to the 1980s, and make some very potent insights about now. Grand-narrative history may be off the curriculum for good, but Storey does what Fredric Jameson urges – he always historicizes. We know that Santa doesn’t exist, but the essay on how Christmas was invented is a gift, not a disappointment. Exposing historical ‘invention’ is Storey’s craft. He reveals the hidden, understanding how culture is made and re-made, rather than imagining it as developing from some original point of authenticity. This book does what all great cultural studies courses and texts should. It shows that the floor we stand on is less stable than we previously thought. As room-shakers we run risks though, if students leave lectures ever so slightly disturbed, things are going well. If they are so alarmed that they never return, we have gone too far. This book will rattle cages, but it also provides some advice on how to rattle back.
Millions are spoken every day?
A few months ago I was with Boyfriend and his kids, after a hockey game, having dinner at McDonald’s. Our excuse at the time was that the game ran late and it was close to the rink and fast. As I sat eating my Quarter Pounder, I looked around and saw many other adults eating dinner as well. There were a few teenagers, but as this was a Sunday night around 7pm, most of them were making trouble elsewhere that night, I guess.
@awienick: Danny Glover peers over, saying "You're one ugly…" as Beck wakes up screaming "MOTHERFUCKER!!!" Fight ensues…
prescriptions were refilled.
Avis: Yes, it's best to use really old and big pandan leaves, they're much greener!
The time has come to expand your realm of thought with something different for a change...the truth! Think unbridled, unscripted, and sometimes unbelievable...
Let me experience the bliss
*Finally, tell the person who nominated you 7 things about yourself. i will try.
paśyanti sūrayaḥ divīva cakṣur ātatam
Friday at 12pm GMT/7am EST.
On a more positive note, the black shadow (in the middle) in this pallete is REALLY black. I love it! All the other black shadows I have aren't pigmented enough and I end up having to layer it a bit to get that intense dark look. I wasn't anticipating how concentrated the colour was going to be when I loaded up my brush and then I touched my lid with it and BAM! Hahah had to crazy blend so avoid harsh edges hahaha!!
“Pete has been a great help in putting the punk back into my tunes,” expressed Caspi, who’s solo works have gravitated toward the Americana-end of the Rock spectrum of late. “He is great to work with and I am really excited about how this album is coming out.”
KAYA ROLL
Angela Bassett ….. Dr. Amanda Waller
The hardest part about unschooling in my opinion is acting on the interests of your kids as they happen. So when Alexander and Sophia asked if we could visit the radio station of Q101.1 on their last day, we went for it.
Another necessary part of actually constructing a house hold for hens to live in is exactly what substances you will need to create this house. Among the advantages of chicken coops would be the fact they are often constructed from just about anything. For example, you may use; wood, Pvc pipes, tarps along with kits.
*Korean Air is offering round trip tickets from Atlanta to Cebu, July 9-19 for $1871, which includes one, four-hour layover in Seoul. Usually prices range from $2000 to $3000 to this island get-away. Cebu is part of the Visayas, a chain of islands that are geographically part of the Philippines.
* The coup-de-grace was when an employee at an airline ticket office refused to sell me a ticket unless I paid a completely ridiculous bribe.
Professor Moore lectures a class on various efforts to make objects invisible. That afternoon, two graduate students join Moore in his laboratory as he continues to talk about the subject. Finally one of them asks him what they're doing there, and he answers that he has invented an invisibility process . . .
I guess I must have had the Serengeti in mind when I made my promise – great plains covered with vast herds of migrating zebras and wildebeest – 1.5 million animals on the hoof… (Oh I am such a city slicker!).
there were many peacful protesters that felt like they were victims of excessive use force and Police Brutality.
Paid off my Mastercard with tax return.
and nothing to conquer to learn
The other night, at a pre-Seminar gathering, I conducted an informal survey: After the apocalypse, what will be your survival skill/economic niche? I was surprised at how many people said they had never considered the question. And I got some interesting answers.
The public forgiveness is complicated mainly because I cannot forgive someone on the behalf of others. I can personally let go of my resentment towards an individual or a group, but it is not my place to forgive them for all that they have done. Nor do I think it does anyone any good when we immediately offer forgiveness in reaction to an announcement by someone who has begun to consider his previous harmful actions.
UNSTOPPABLE.
“But after him and with him are all inventors of unlawful heresies, who indeed refer to the Scriptures, but do not hold such opinions as the saints (hagioi) have handed down, and receiving them as the traditions of men, err, because they do not rightly know them nor their power.” (Epis 59: 4)
“Aww, Charlie. Have you been tapping the business till for poker money?”
I love to cross stitch, it is my addiction and my most favorite designers are Little House Needleworks, Country Cottage Needleworks, Prairie Schooler, Blackbird Designs, Carriage House, Plum Street Samplers...yadda, yadda...I could go on and on with that vein. I love to listen to books on my MP3 player, stitch and walk (which I'm trying to convince myself that I like, but I really don't I just do it for exercise) 3 miles per day (6-7 days per week).
of the center of the universe.
Just a little flower, a button and some ribbon...and well... I was pretty pleased with the result if I may say so myself :-) What do you think of it?
ThunderCats Magazine – The Details
The extraordinary nature of the design of this system is quite indisputable. All of these perfect square tubes have a layer that works just like a mirror. Furthermore, each one of these cells is sited by means of precise geometrical alignments, so that they all focus the light at a single point.
I'm in the process of growing out my hair so I chose to
Introducing reading to someone who doesn't read very much can be a very great gift but it doesn't always work that way. Some people just don't want to read books very often. My mom is not much of a reader. There is a specific kind of book she will read, some times, but she isn't the one to buy books for because most of the time she doesn't read. It's worth the effort sometimes to at least try but for some, they may never be big on reading but an occasional book gift isn't a bad idea for even them.
How the police minister lied
A veil is put upon your eyes
So far so good, this is a "special/select" ale with some bite, but it's quite drinkable. It's substantial for just one but okay if you feel like snagging another one.
Harper was unimpressed with the comparison, saying the NDP leader was accusing officials of being “biased, prejudiced, and even racist . . . without any evidence” during question period Wednesday.
In my world inflation exists and the value of the dollar is decreasing.
The guy was close - maybe a hundred and fifty meters away.
As is typical for me, I didn’t pay any attention to the clock and before I knew it, it was noon. Dawdle, dawdle - not good. A lot of sales end at 1 or 2. Oh well, whatever will be will be. I set off for an estate sale being held by an 87 year old man. Upon arrival I chit-chatted with him for few minutes and then went off to poke around. He told me that everything was 1/2 off. Good thing. His things were kind of pricey.
4. Dissension between the husband and the wife disrupts the whole family life; they are like oxen unequally yoked, no work can be accomplished for all the striving with one another.
Preschoolers at childcare, though, spend 70 to 84% of their time in sedentary pursuits, and only 2 to 3% of their time in vigorous play.
The added worry for many of us (who want to be as autonomous as possible) is not just that we can't live without technology; it is that we adjust our lives to fit our technology instead of vice verse. Instead of using a piece of technology as a tool, which is wholly devoted to serving us, we instead change our habits, views, etc. to fit that technology. As an example, we change our methods of emailing, writing, etc. to conform to whatever new technologies (ie. a new version of Word) that come along. If a new IT system demands that we learn a new series of processes, we do it.
Paper: Chocolate Chip,Whisper White, Creamy Caramel (R)
physical comfort God has allowed to you, until the time, as clearly as I hear
This year, just like every year, the CPA / Auditor we have hired sent their field team to the church to begin to review our financial practices and to present our financial statements. Their activity will end with a report to the church’s Finance Committee. The report will mostly be comprised of numbers representing the church’s financial position at the end of our last fiscal year.
For more information, go to The Inside Coach and review our online courses, training programs, Build-a-Plan on demand, or visit our bookstore of leading-edge authors.
y) not press the button and always be curious or;
Berkin
One very nice afternoon I took him and Aiden to the local playground, Fort McHenry, as both Mark and Aiden LOVE kids! And kids love them! I got a video as we were sitting in the grass of Mark playing with Aiden’s leash. This was just before Aiden turned 2, and you can see how amazing these Gentle Giants called Irish Wolfhouds really are.
Reality defeated imagination in that short exchange – the reality that Beth lived a life of dreams. The girl never would have betrayed the man who stole her heart if the waitress had never mentioned that desire to see the poet… to have a chance to know the mind that sang the feelings that forced her soul to recognize herself. A brief pause as Beth looked at the worn leather of her hardback copy of Shakespeare’s collected works… It meant nothing in reality. With that same resolution that every lover makes when she decides to absolve herself of her purest desires, Beth walked over to that other table, and she grabbed the newsprint magazine, and then, she returned to her customary place of service to open its pages of solid reality.
All the evil ugly darkness
We have a few pages of ads and the editorial begins on page 7. Ian Livingstone talks about how WD was voted the best games magazine in the recent Game Day Awards. The questionnaire they did a few months back is reprinted here (later in the magazine) and they want to get feedback.
Elisabeth’s debut release for Whimsy Stamps is the Little Cottage Cuties line of rubber stamps and will be available to buy from the Whimsy store tomorrow (7 March 2012). In the lead up to their release, the Whimsy DT and Special Guests are excited to share with you 2 days packed full of previews of these gorgeous stamps.
but leftovers after room’s been made
5 All Mine 4:00
I will be back with Grease photo's..... it's been a while now!!!
Selected comments:
On Sunday I did some more beading, a bit of knitting, and puttering around the house. The weather was nice, but very chilly. I kept hoping it would warm up enough to sit out on the deck. Even tried doing so. It was just too cold. So, I watched some more of those Star Trek Voyager DVD's while doing all of the above. I was putting fringe on my little African stitch amulet bag. However, I'm very unhappy about it. I used Fireline and the fringe is all crooked and messy looking. It won't hang nice and straight or drape correctly. I think the thread is too stiff and kinky. I think I'm going to have to take it all out and do it with a more drapey thread. Sigh. Well, I've learned something from this project.
Urad dhal - 1/2 teaspoon
4) Take the button above and post about it. Use the Mr. Linky below to sign up, but make sure you link it directly to your post about this challenge.
Exodus 23:20-23:
We don’t abide to a particular schedule; but tend to feel out what works best and base it on the amount of new or relevant site content on a given day. Facebook is a different story — it’s based on an algorithm designed to prevent overposting, especially by brands, so we limit ourselves to only a few posts a day to maximize our reach.
What do they look like eh! Mark has the red hair Jamie the blonde and I think they were both suffering from the excesses of the night before.
Meanwhile, while I wait to go on a zipper run, I have a couple of pairs of pants just waiting for finishing touches. One pair just needs a hem to be wearable, so I might as well go ahead and finish them. I also picked up a couple of really nice fabrics yesterday at my local Walmart of all places. I'm not sure what's going on over there. They had downsized and rearranged their fabric department like most other stores, and it was mostly just cheap quilting cottons and a handful of ugly home dec fabrics. But suddenly they have three aisles of fabric, and some of it is really nice! I picked up a sweet piece of dark wash denim (yes, we'll have to wait and see how nice it is after pre-washing) and a pretty piece of poly suiting in an unusual taupe/brown color that will make a nice pair of pants for the office. Now if they would just get a decent stock of zippers!
To reiterate: as far as I can tell, no no one has presented evidence that challenges the accuracy of the data that Aucejo, Arcidiacono, and Spenner presented. But in the contemporary academy, which worships before the altar of “diversity,” accurate scholarship can be insufficient—and can even, as in this case, generate an implicit rebuke from a university leadership.
3/ The SNP are going to lose the 2015 Westminster election.
Paul Clement: What do you have in mind? Boehner still owes me $350,000 for billable hours just defending DOMA.
Boys with gender identity disorder often show marked feminine mannerisms and speech patterns.
**The Daycare had their annual spring/graduation program. It was of course adorable and Lauren had so much fun. She has been practicing her songs for weeks.
Go to Google Play Now Â»
I made my first scrapbook for a friend in High School 20 years ago. I sort of took a break and then was introduced to Stampin' Up in 1996. A few cards here and there... then full on Scrapbooking started in 1999. I scrapbook and make cards on a pretty equal basis now and as much as I can.
5 Fallen Angels 14:59
oh and to modify.....
Although there might seem to be many ways you can “get” energy where there wasn’t any before, you’re never really conjuring anything out of nowhere. If you light a match, you’ll be releasing heat (thermal energy) that wasn’t around before, but it comes at the cost of the resources you’re burning. The amount of energy released in the flame exactly matches the lost energy that existed in a different form in the chemicals that made up the match.
Many things transpired to make me leave in my 5 month of pregnancy. In the beginning we went from place to place. Where ever we could find to sleep. Finally ending up at a hotel with weekly rates and a small kitchen.
with a clownish tv host from NBC?
3. Lou Ann Barton - Rockin' Around the Christmas Tree
The Better Book Company provides a ‘Complete Guide to Self-Publishing’ brochure and a free copy can be obtained by contacting them through their website.
And yet, I still don't want to write about this.
Jesus Christ in morning devotions; attended prayer meetings and church; taught
Product(s): Ground beef products - establishment 761
Denise took the dress from her mother smiling the slightest, trying to hide it from Gracie who seen and slipped out the door so she could try it on.
The carpet snake lingered for quite a while, meandering between the hen house and the garage. We would often see it on the rafters of the garage. While it is not uncommon to see them occasionally, it was unusual to see this one so much! Eventually I rang a snake wrangler who removed the snake from the garage and relocated it elsewhere.
It sounds like it will be run much like the job fairs we attended to land jobs teaching overseas, only compressed into a day instead of over a whole weekend.
"Actually, it's little person"
- Very light, felt like I was not wearing false eyelashes
The race atmosphere in LaGrange was really cool. There was tons to do and tons of people cheering (and lots and lots and lots of cowbells), I just wish I'd had more time to take it in. After Kyle passed on the bike I did manage to make a quick pit stop.
Level 2: Recovers 20 HP and 6 MP every 4 seconds.
Diana, the Christian spinster with Tourette’s, held my interest for a glimmer of a minute before I realised that she too was just another mouthpiece for Coupland’s clichés. Harj, the Sri Lankan call centre worker, was also readable. But the others? I got to the point where I was just skimming the pages rather than reading their narratives. Julien was the worst. A smug World of Warcraft fanatic, he insisted on reproducing pages of gaming narrative as well as a long plot summary of the sci-fi anime Space Battleship Yamato. Yawn. I get that Julien is meant to be annoying but there’s no excuse for devoting a near-fifth of your book to a character so dreary that readers will barely be bothered to hold the book open at the right page.
Hair/Makeup – T. Carlton Salon (Smithtown, NY)
Ho, ho, God’s love opens this
It all would have went off without a hitch if there hadn't been a huge metal pole in the middle of the room...
I am taking a little postcard break on this trip. But then again,
Well, I took the plunge and hung my bus scroll on our living room wall and I LOVED it so much that it inspired me to get moving and decorate the other walls.
Next up is adding some framed artwork above the bed! I have the frames, not I just need the artwork. Any suggestions on where you can get inexpensive/free prints online?
"Without society putting into place mechanisms to ensure the success of the departmental programmes, the prisoners may be susceptible to recidivism," the statement said. -- Sapa
Still, at least London’s getting some top class sporting facilities. Super.
E.S.P.
The findings are based on a study of 24,436 employees of IBM, the technology company, across 75 different countries.
There are two different types of opposition. The ability to distinguish the two is utterly critical for life.
2 tbsp tomato ketchup
Chris kept trying to tell me it looked like a camel.
Catch them under the cut.
with CHOICE.
old classics and more.
And then I got to thinking.... have I ever written down everywhere I worked, other than in a resume? I don't think I have....... So just for the journaling sake of this blog- I thought I'd give it a whirl. And who knows, maybe someone out there in blog land will think I'm cool too. ;D (one can only hope).
Got a question about running, racing, training, or how beer relates to it all? Submit it to Ramblings of a Beer runner via e-mail. I'm not a doctor, licensed therapist, or coach, nor have played one on TV. But I have run for over 30 years, competed in high school and college, and had a few beers along the way, and like helping fellow beer runners out. So take my advice for what that's worth.
in our Capricorn form
The Punker, Edgier Storm- It sucked, people hated it, it went away.
All go then for the team here at Mr Moo's, it is really great to meet with potential new customers and pass on our enthusiasm for proper dairy ice cream. Towards the end of the month sees the announcement of the REYTA 2011 Awards at Bridlington Spa, so, fingers crossed, we may be in the running for an award this year, lets hope so!
Political correctness is most pervasive in universities and colleges but I rarely report the incidents concerned here as I have a separate blog for educational matters.
The fabulous designers are
My confession: I have a messy house. Frequently, a dirty house. Almost all the time. It has been this way... forever, I think. My room when I was young would get overwhelmingly messy, until my Mom made me and my sisters clean it. When I moved out on my own... OK, actually, the first time I moved out on my own, my place was clean. Like, OCD clean. Everything had its place, and I worked meticulously to make sure everything STAYED in its place. I was one of those people that if something on my table was one-quarter inch away from where it "should" be, I couldn't rest until I'd made it right. Wow, I hadn't thought about that in a long time.
The new kit from Noel Mignon is available for preorder and there are only a few left!
That he is the only hope
I guess what the movie was trying to say is that love is a really powerful thing. Even without Howl, Calcifer was able to move the house when Sophie asked him to. The heart was more powerful than magic.
Reading Peter Ackroyd’s biography of William Blake (‘Blake’, Vintage) I found a marvellous account of how Blake saw the Archangel Gabriel in his study. Blake was reading Edward Young’s ‘Night Thoughts’ when he came to a passage where the poet asks ‘who can paint an angel?’ Blake shut the book and mused aloud:
ANDREW: No. She’s mine. We talked at recess.
Football Dataco Ltd and others v Yahoo! UK Limited Case C-604/10, Court of Justice of the European Union (ECJ), Advocate General’s opinion of 15 December 2011
“In their case the god of this world has blinded the minds of the unbelievers, to keep them from seeing the light of the gospel of the glory of Christ, who is the image of God. For what we proclaim is not ourselves, but Jesus Christ as Lord, with ourselves as your servants for Jesus’ sake.” 2 Corinthians 4:4-5
Honestly, I am a skeptic but I also could not comment intelligently on the merits of the work as it is outside my field of expertise. And so I thought of blogging this to get feedbacks.
These books are very easy to read--he could have easily read them himself but instead I read to him while he was in bed. They depict the trail and homesteading from the perspective of a 10-year-old boy.
Now bear with me. The word "poach," as in poaching an egg by cooking it in simmering water, comes to us from the Old French word, "poche," meaning "bag." Remember the yolk held in its own little bag of white, almost like a soft little purse? And the word, "poach," as in to take something that doesn't belong to you, comes from the Middle German word, "poken." "Poken" means to trespass, to poke into a place where you don't belong. Historians believe that somewhere along the line the two words crossed paths. Poachers carry bags for their quarry and all kinds of little "bags" are created by poking into things (pits, pocks, pockets etc-- "pick pockets" are poachers who poke).
Price: $269
I wanted to wake early in order to be out and on the roads, driving through the gorgeous Autumn countryside, taking the rural back roads and enjoying the drive. But only on the way home!
In the past I have sent them photographs or ideas to use as prompts for their writing. But this time we did something different. The end of the workshop coincided with the annual Angkor Photo Festival. This festival was started years ago by an international group of photojournalists who then also began to put cameras into the hands of local street kids. Those kids became the first group to attend the shelter which has now become Anjali House, and now with its Writing Workshop, we decided it was time to combine the two arts projects together. So this time the kids used their own photographs as prompts and I think the results are quite beautiful. As they say, "Imagination is the Best Power." I am so proud to be a part of it, and I can't wait to be back with them leading their next workshop in March.
This morning I got up way to early ( couldn’t sleep) so I decided to make myself a new Gravatar. I have tried to upload it to the blog but I use Photo-bucket and Photo-bucket is down. So maybe tomorrow.
The flash mount and the winding knob bolt do not come off. You also cannot remove the strap bolts on the side, though I'm told they have a tendency to pop off during use.
Cornell always does interesting things with the Brigadier. We get to see how much he admires the Doctor as an embodiment of English virtue. Perhaps in tribute to Barry Letts, Cornell reveals that the Brigadier is a Buddhist. The Brigadier believes that the Doctor is a Bodhivista, one who has gained enlightenment, but who remains in this world to help others. This is a fascinating spin on the Doctor Who mythos.
Monday is a day off in lieu for the weekend (but only for lessons) as teachers and students are expected to go into school for their clubs and activities!
Before my last trip, I had posted that I was fortunate enough to pick up some new gear. My review of the Nikkor 50mm lens with test shots will be coming up this week, but I did want to write my thoughts on the Lowepro 350AW pack. Overall, the pack gets an A from me due to its size and comfort. I was easily able to fit my D5100, three lenses (including my 70-300mm), memory cards, batteries and other accessories in the bottom compartment. My only dislike was that I wasn’t able to fit the camera body with the telephoto lens attached, but that is me being picky.
Complexion of peaches and cream,
Each hardware device (be it a switch, router, server, or firewall) operates as its own isolated island which requires individual configuration. Seeing the shortcomings of such a setup, researchers and startup companies like Nicira have started to develop open software control systems under a coined term of “software defined networking” (SDN). Stuart Miniman defines SDN as “a model for network control, based on the idea that network traffic flow can be made programmable at scale, thus enabling new dynamic models for traffic management.” Similar to the way virtualization can be used to host many (virtual) computers on one physical piece of hardware, these virtualized networks could allow companies to run multiple network slices off of a single physical network.
Participants who attend both workshop days have the opportunity to get their short story or novel excerpt critiqued and the notes returned to them on Sunday.
Here's the weekly round-up of arrivals for review at the o' Stuff...
I know, right? It’s been eons. I never thought I’d be the blog that would show up on someone’s sidebar with the last update tagged as 3 Months Ago. Seriously. I blame it all on my camera lens. Short after I wrote Yagoot for You…three months ago…my new camera lens cracked. And it spent almost two months being “repaired” before the company decided to just replace it with one that was IN STOCK at the store. Why they didn’t just do that in the first place is beyond me, but whatever. If you’re familiar with a 1.4 lens, you know: once you go 1.4, you don’t go back. All that to say, I rarely took picture for 6 + weeks.
“Hence — two consequences:
your grand staircase no long bound with steps
And there are not a lot of accountants who specialise in foreign tax law, either. Mine told me this year that if I start earning foreign income, I will have to find another accountant because his firm isn’t equipped to deal with that sort of scenario.
Magnus Fin and the Ocean Quest is your debut children’s novel. Is it your first attempt at writing a children’s novel or do you have other manuscripts hiding away?
Though it's my name on the cover the books I've written have a large amount of Sarah's DNA entwined into every page. I kinda feel bad it is only my name but hey, I'm needy.
With almost any disease early detection and treatment leads to more lives saved and less deadly consequences. African American woman are more likely to die from breast cancer than our Caucasian counterparts and detection is at the core. African American women have a five year survival rate of 77% after diagnosis as compared to 90% for white women. Why? With African Americans breast cancer is detected at later stages, when the success rate of treatment drops. In addition African American women under the age of 40 have more aggressive and deadly tumors, need earlier and more frequent breast cancer screenings, and aggressive medical treatment to increase their survival advantages.
Meanwhile, once I got all of the children in the group started, I stopped ONE of them and asked that child to practice saying the letters on his or her RAN board with me. When that child finished, I went on to the next child and did the same thing, and so on. It’s a method that has worked for me fairly well, year after year. I also send a copy of these RAN boards home with each child so that they can work on them at home, and I update them regularly as well.
I paid my bill, bade place goodnight;
*Libraries not only have books, they carry audio materials such as books on tape/cd and music cds, video materials (both fiction and non-fiction), they may have language programs available online for free, they likely have language tapes to check out, and don't forget your library's summer and school-year programs that are almost always FREE!!
33.- Teach your children to observe truth.
Both Bercot’s and Tibbetts’s workplaces are unionized by the IUOE Local 150 union hierarchy. Both workers have refrained from union membership. However, they are still forced to accept IUOE Local 150 union officials’ so-called “representation” and are required to pay dues to the union as a condition of employment until expiration of contracts entered into before Indiana’s Right to Work law was enacted.
What sort of attitude is that? said the weathergirl, who’d given up pushing cold fronts about and was addressing him directly.
I know why I had this dream. Yesterday, we went to our accountant. A young, Latino guy who is the Jr in his accounting business with his father. We found out that wifesy will get about a $500 deduction for me because we are considered “single” even though we are married. If we were considered married by the federal government, wifesy would’ve received a deduction of approximately $11,900.
I also own the LBB Sienna Dress Pattern, but never made a dress from it. (Only pajama tops). Once I saw that the pre-made dresses she sold had a flounce/circle skirt bottom, I wanted to make my dresses like those. They were so much cuter than the straight ruffle bottom that came with the pattern. I had always planned on figuring out the measurements to add the flounce/circle skirt bottom, but never quite got to it.
At least I'll try to post one weekly! So I didn't gain all this weight totally from fast food. I LOVE to cook. Not so much baking (way too much measuring and exactness for me), but good old-fashioned cooking. I mostly try out my recipes on Sunday's because that's when I have the most time. I can start out early so that if I screw up Jason (my husband) has time to run out and buy us dinner. I made the following chicken recipe for dinner tonight — and rather liked it. A little too much cumin for my taste ... thought it took away from the lime taste. Tonight's recipe is from the magazine Cooking Light:
She nodded and we made it back to the bed where I fell in between her open legs. She had her arms around my neck, then moved a hand down to help guide my dick into her wet pussy. I slid the head in, connecting with an initial tightness that told me to stay in the entrance, working the head of my dick just inside until I felt the self-lubricant flow and she opened for me, and I pushed the whole length of my cock inside her warm wet cunt. I reached under one knee and pulled it up in the crook of my arm to stretch her and open her wider, and then we were connected and wet and sizzling and I pulled myself slowly from her, and then slowly pushed back inside. Slow, wet meat sliding inside wet meat, sliding, tingling, and then again. Slowly out, slowly in, then slowly out and let my weight press me in more quickly. Then over and over, and I’d raise myself, pulling out from her hole then letting my weight plunge my cock back into her. Her cunt was open and wet now, and received me hungrily each time I rose then dove back inside her. She said, “Oh god,” and drops of sweat fell from my forehead, and we fucked like that until we both came and rolled away from each other, breathing hard.
Young Hunting - Sweet Bird
Arriving in Orange Walk Town, the second largest settlement in Belize, we stop in at a small store to stock up on a few things. I ask the Criole woman behind the counter if she knows of anywhere we can pitch our tent for the night. Why of course, she replies, we can camp on her neighbours lawn just across the road. I'm a little taken aback by the generosity, but Raul jumps in and acccepts the offer enthusiastically. We buy a couple of beers and pull up some chairs in front of the store where we then pass the evening talking with the store owners David - a small olive skinned man of about fifty with grey hair cropped short over a narrow featured face and skinny arms with fading tattoos sprouting from under his clean white singlet - and his wife Maria - thick curly brown hair, big glasses a flowery blouse and a loud musical laugh. Their two teenage daughters also join us - Geri and Rebecca -
What does she do? She gloats and states how she has the ear of the district manager and how she has control of whether the boss gets to keep his job or not. I told her several times to shut up, but someone like her can't seem to keep her mouth shut. Her aim, by fair means or fowl is to get the boss fired. When I told her people who live in glass houses shouldn't throw stones she was bewildered. She had never heard that phrase before I guess. When I explained to her that someone who really isn't doing their job complaining about someone else not doing their job is very ironic she went over the edge and spent the next ten minutes screaming at me. I spent the majority of that ten minutes laughing at her.
Systems Advisors Group and Acquity Group will work together to implement Microsoft Dynamics AX 2012 for accounting, project management, resource management and scheduling, time and expense entry and approvals, and human resource management. By replacing a series of existing business systems with a single integrated solution, we’re looking forward to helping Acquity Group streamline key business processes and improve access to critical business information in order to maximize profitability and client satisfaction levels. This solution will also provide Acquity Group with a solid platform on which to continue the rapid growth and expansion of their organization.
They are all fabulous and I am more thankful than you all will know for each and every time you participate in anything we do here at By LORi Designs!
Despite vaguely promising on Sunday to return Mali to its pre-coup constitution and to civilian rule, the CNRDRE junta seems to be digging in its heels. Within hours of making his supposedly conciliatory remarks, Captain Amadou Sanogo, the junta leader, stated that the CNRDRE remains in power and will play a guiding role in Mali’s transition. The fact that the Malian army is in total disarray, and that three of Mali’s eight regions have fallen to a motley coalition of Islamist and Tuareg rebels since the coup, has not phased the junta’s determination — even though its primary justification for ousting President Amadou Toumani Touré last month was the need for a firm military response to the rebellion.
The chapters on the roles of husbands and wives look at the responsibilities of leadership and submission from a different angle. Presenting both biblical and practical advice, the author challenges his readers to accept the role God has given them without sounding overly preachy. He also explains the cultural myths that will need to be challenged and overcome to be successful.
~ Continue Weight Watchers and attend meeting/weigh-in once a week.
Living here has been quite the test of endurance for me. I've blogged about some of my favorite episodes, the time I kissed my banker, my lack of understanding of french fashion, the time I realized that Paris streets are perpetually covered in a shit carpet... if dealing with France gracefully were a geographic location and the equator was "normal", I'm pretty sure I'd be sharing space with polar bears.
Today is Valentine’s Day. Two days ago was Lincoln’s Birthday. Two holidays close on the calendar that seemingly couldn’t be more different.
This story was a product of the bits and pieces of stories, randomly told by my mom , aunt Naty and sometimes by my dad. Now I know why we he named his kids with American names. Now I know why we grew up watching mostly American shows, even documentaries in which I am now thankful of. Maybe this explains why, when my dad had a bicycle for a gift, took good care of it even to his last days.
Being jealous means that they had conviction. Conviction will either drive one away from Christ because of pride, or draw one to Christ for salvation. In this case they rebelled at the preaching of the Word of God. They deemed it all foolishness.
To say that an era passed when Bernie Boyle died would be a cliché, and yet…
corecorina Supernova makes engages by having weekly live events with online voting, and content that changes based on user engagement
Today I made a card for the Clean and Simple challenge over at Splitcoast. The challenge today was called "shades of blue". I pulled out an old SU! set called Echoes of Kindness and colored the image with a variety of blue chalks. I added a few blue shaded embellishments and there you have it! Quick and easy today!
Snacks (M&Ms usually!)
I am thinking...that I *should* eliminate the word 'should' from my vocabulary.
“Liam Mulligan returns as a man who fell in love a long time ago with the wrong profession, journalism, and who records the layoffs and cutbacks inflicted on his daily paper in Providence, Rhode Island, as he struggles to keep doing investigative work. A last-minute assignment to cover a soiree at a Newport mansion finds Mulligan catching a breather on the famed Cliff Walk fronting the mansions and facing the sea. He’s just in time to see a man in a tuxedo fall to his death on the rocks below.
The site said the Oct. 8 to 15 cruise will be a “tribute and celebration of Bice,” who died of cancer. A month later, her 47-year-old daughter Lee died of undisclosed causes.
In my last post I told the tale of the Inca Trail, the 43 kilometre hike that took us from Ollantaytambo to Machu Picchu. It left off on a sour note, as the mighty ruins had not appeared from the ever-present cloud, and this had left our group irritable and tired after the hard slog up there.
So, thank you all so much.
This recipe is for a 7-Layer Finger Jello and you can adjust accordingly.
Director: James Strong
1 tsp garlic powder
Greek Cheese Cake with Crushed Mixed
*really, it's more like a palette than a box*
cover and bake at 400 for 15 minutes
In January, Phoebe Prince made the decision to end her life. She was fifteen years old. Her younger sister found her hanging in the stairwell of their apartment. Phoebe was the victim of bullying at South Hadley High School in Massachusetts. Her family had moved to America in the autumn of 2009 from Ireland. Phoebe was the new kid in town. And she was not met by the Welcome Wagon.
Here at Kiwi, one of the best parts of our job is that we get to assist people when they really need our help. Right after Hurricane Ike in 2008, we sent many of our DFW technicians to help our Houston guys with the surplus of water damage jobs. We got to help our customers restore a piece of normalcy in their lives, and that really meant something special to us.
As to the live dating, the gent wanted too much of my personal time well before I was ready to give it. I told him this but he was so enamored by his own feeling of infatuation, that he didn’t hear me. I ended it, amicably at first, but I’m not sure what offended me more – the fact that he didn’t try to get to know me via the simple act of listening when I expressed my need to go slowly, or the fact that he pursued me anyway and thus pulled from me a mean side I didn’t appreciate having to display.
Tonight’s soundtrack included the mighty Power Quest, Mad Max, Big Country, Donnie Vie and Slam Cartel.
I don't know where all of these appointments and treatments are leading. The doctor mentioned the possibility or fusing the cartilage-less joint, but I am hopeful that physio can help. I was impressed with the therapist who took much time in diagnosing my condition and discussing it with me. I am so comfortable with her that I think that I am glad that I waited so long if that's what it took. I have had the foot analyzed by a physiotherapist once before, and this exam was much more thorough. After one session, the foot feels a little looser, so perhaps some progress can be made. Even if I can manage somewhat longer without undergoing an operation, I will be pleased. In the meantime, I am hoping to recover some more mobility and reduced pain when I walk, for lately when I do go out to try my ... er ... foot ... at walking, I just say that I am going out for a hobble.
What do you think will happen next?
It’s really the “rafting” that wins you over. Sea otters are sociable, and float together in groups of up to a hundred, frequently clasping paws so that they don’t drift away from each other.
Happy Saturday Loves. Hope you are enjoying your weekend. I had to share my newest drink Obsession: Elderflower Mint Prosecco Cocktail. This drink is pure heaven in a glass. You might think it is weird to add cucumber and mint to your champagne but I assure it is not. It gives the drink such a lovely fresh taste. The perfect bubbly drink for a summer night! Enjoy!
What about you? What sort of things would you or are you looking for in an agent?
A quick stir with the wooden spoon
4. Blood From The Air
Soon as I get to church I am well greeted.
BOO, YOU STINK!
- I'm sure you could do carob ones if you have issues with chocolate.
The basis of Astrology at any level is we and the universe have a harmonic energy. Through growth, aging, experience it can become muddled like bad GPS. Instead of it helping us grow it makes us shrink hide and fail. Using Reiki, alongside informed astrological information we can fix our GPS or energy pattern.
Prof. Plisner
I do indeed. The Blue Mountains has seasons which having been born and bred in Sydney I really appreciate. I hate hot, humid weather so the cold agrees with me. I’m a keen gardener so being able to grow a lot of cold climate plants is a great joy. But I have to admit I don’t walk enough which is one of the best things about living in the mountains.
That evening they mesmerized me with more stories about their trip. Kent cigarette packages worked well with border inspectors without our gifts confiscated. Mama’s German lessons paid off so much so that Tati commended her and atoned her for having alleged that she squandered time drinking Turkish coffee.
The ensemble cast around Wahlberg is top notch, with actors like William H. Macy, john C. Reilly, Luis Guzman, Julianne Moore, and Don Cheadle attempting to bring a certain dignity to the adult film industry by struggling with their own mundane problems as they work at becoming adult film stars. But it is just not compelling viewig for me.
Even if he wants to…even if he knows it’s the way through all this.
Heat the oil, add the onion, fry until soft but not brown, remove from heat.
13. Fly Away (For John La Grand Rip) 6:19
The peak load demand for electricity in Australia is approximately 50,000 Megawatts and only small part of this comes from the Snowy Hydro Electric System (the ultimate power
The reservoir water was never suitable for household use. So in 1916 Orchard City-the territory from the top of Cory Grade to a point about four miles north of Eckert-was incorporated and bonded for $50,000 to secure pure mountain water for domestic use. A pipe line laid from springs on the top of Grand Mesa brings an ample supply of water to Surface Creek Mesa residents for use in the homes along the way.
Coimbatore North Ladies Circle built the 12-classroom block as well as the recreational center, with the assistance of Round Table. LC 11 raises its monies through an annual raffle, which is utilized for new classrooms, books, clothes and groceries. They also do smaller projects in other schools, which could involve wheelchair donations, sponsoring lunch’s or even participating in their cultural programs.
Anyway, on every episode they are eating their delicious cheese, and I was getting so hungry for cheese, that I couldn't take it anymore. So, I went online and ordered it at their online store....while I was there I couldn't help myself, and ordered a ton of their goat's milk soap. Look below for details on how to win a bar of this luxurious soap!
I am definitely planning on bringing my camera for this once in a lifetime event. T-minus 4 hours...
There are two primary gospel stories (with many variations) from which we must choose. One confuses the diagnosis for the prescription and remains enslaved. The other distinguishes between the two and finds salvation.
His fascination with the hypercube a four-dimensional cube and unfolding of a hypercube is featured in "Corpus Hypercubus" which changes the traditional form but it is still recognisable and we know what it represents. His "Last Supper" and "The Christ of St. John of the Cross" are the masterpieces of the twentieth century. This brings us to the essence of great Art: genius and inspiration.
A unique vision
And one more for the road:
Michael Stanley –Rock and Roll Man –pic sleeve
Sometimes life gives you tools you need-
I had a lot of fun creating this space. It's not what I'd want in a 'normal home', but this apartment is temporary, and it works well for now. It's really Pinterest inspired and it was really inexpensive. I'll show you the fun things I made and bought, but I don't want to take time to link to every idea. So if you want to see, it's mostly on my 'fun for kids' board, and a little on my 'DIY craft ideas' board.
Conservatives are conservative for various reasons. Some want to preserve traditional morality, some are nationalists, some are fiscal conservatives, some just want the government out of their business, etc. So I don’t want to make the assumption that liberals are all liberal for the same reason.
The above picture is a good example of the hollyhocks potential and acumen. The tree has a little personal space where the mover can't come and this where the hollyhock takes root. In an afternoon I could easily find 100 other examples like this of the limited needs of the hollyhock.
“The conspiracy theory/theorist soubriquet is reflexively feared by professional journalists and academics alike who believe (with some justification) their reputations will be undermined by such thought crimes against the state. Thus, like an instrument that would easily be at home in the most extreme totalitarian regimes, intellectual workers self-discipline themselves as the “conspiracy theory” mechanism determines the trajectory and parameters of public discourse, dissent, and recollection.
See you Monday!
FRANKLY, as my wife says, we will need tee shirts.
Adria Harper, director of the First Amendment Foundation in Tallahassee, said the debate continues on how to make Florida’s court records available online. Among the more recent developments: A committee identified a narrow list of what records should be kept off the Internet.
The answer: she doesn’t have to. (what did big dresses and jilbabs have to do with this, anyway?)
I had momentary visions of being at the house on both days pontificating to anyone who would listen about my design ethos and hopes for mankind. No, I decided, no one needs to hear my senseless drivel. Also people had paid their money and should be able to say what they like about my house.
During the day, these cats lead a, well, dog's life. They live in well-maintained cat houses, dine at the five or so hidden feeding stations, have access to health care (shots, neutering, spaying, no botox though :) ). The cats are kept under wraps when the Park is open to guests, although rumor has it you might be able to spot a cute tabby face from the Jungle Cruise ride.
Jug jug jug jug jug jug
1. Mix 6 tablespoons of red cargo rice & white Jasmine rice in a deep bowl and cook in the microwave. (With water level one finger joint above rice level – cook for approximately 15minutes, check after 10 minutes).
Holy Ghosts.
60 second plank
The Upsetters - Nyambie Dub
up with for the Challenge!! We have some great ones coming up this month,
It is a beautiful cluster of buildings creating in its heart a sense of community, space to become, a place of hope and possibility.
I know I have tried Mary’s Gone Crackers crackers but not their sticks and twigs.
This problem, in actuality, doesn't just concern digital photographers, but also those who love silver photography, although the negatives are pretty resistant and, if well preserved, last for a long time, sooner or later they'll age and ruin, as everything in life, unfortunately eternity doesn't exist... READ MORE
Gathering courage, I grab his face,
Get your shit together
Today, I ate a cupcake.
I think this is kind of self-explanatory… but I guess I’ll break it down anyway. Every guy friend I know has told me that if a guy is interested in a woman, he won’t be able to let a week go by without contacting her in some kind of way. He’s going to want to hear her voice. He’s going to want to see her name come up on his phone screen or his email. And it doesn’t matter how busy he is either, if he likes you he’ll make the time. So think about if he’s making the time more and more? That’s a pretty good sign that his interest is increasing.
Obviously, in the case of CHRONAL ENGINE, the theme was dinosaurs, so I had dinosaur footprints on the floor, dinosaur-shaped cookies, cupcakes with dinosaur pictures. When Jeff Crosby's WIENER WOLF came out, he had mini hot dogs from Frank's and relatives dressed up as wolves.
carry it out of the living room
As I mentioned last week, my RWA chapter, Chicago-North hosted its bi-annual conference this past weekend. Chicago Spring Fling 2012 was a huge success. The conference ran from Friday through Saturday night. I didn’t attend any workshops early on Friday because I was on transportation duty and had to pick up an editor from the airport, but from what I heard people started early and the information was great.
Transparent, easy to understand pricing? We love! Kudos to all of the airlines who have adapted this approach ahead of schedule.
The Steenkamp murders has developed into a rather controversial and emotional issue, which has shocked a broad spectrum of South Africa’s European community. See the preceding post and its accompanying comments for more info.
I have used Orchard Love, because I was in love by her stunning hair! I have printed my text on my printer and the design paper is of Maja Design. Furthermore I used a heart doily and flowers of Wild Orchid Craft, a swirl and berries of Magnolia. Also I used my latest purchase: the lovely corners of Cheery Lynn. Of course I used my copics to colour my image!
Luckily for me, my eyesight is perfectly fine at the moment. Nothing appears blurry to me, except for the quantum theory of black holes and its relationship with matter consumption in spacetime, but I don’t think corrective lenses will clear that up. Anyway, I’ll keeping my fingers crossed that my eye sight doesn’t deteriorate further. In fact, I’ll be keeping my eyes crossed too.
Snow: not much but still. I put out three bags of rock salt and threw two handfuls at the passing plow.
I have no idea what startled me awake. But I do know it was some kind of miniature miracle (what do they call those? Stroke of good luck, maybe?) because if I hadn't woken up until my alarm went off, I probably would have finished the dream and exited REM and snoozed and woken up normally and that would have been the beginning of my day and the end, forever, of whatever happened inside my head last night (I'm a very clean dreamer--I never remember anything I dream, ever, unless I'm woken up in the middle of it). But my dream last night was SO UTTERLY AWESOME that instead of snoozing I waddled over to my computer and started setting down an outline based on the dream. It's the PERFECT story (well, sort of--I'm going to have to seriously edit my dream main character, since she was really credulous and unquestioning, like my dream main characters always are for some reason).
The Texas Tech versus Texas A&M game is this weekend, and we are taking my parents! They have never been to any sort of a college football game before so that should be a wonderful time.
self.dev.handle.controlMsg(0x21, 0x09, direction+self.CMDFILL, 0x02, 0x01)
FOR HIGH ALTITUDE BAKING (5,200 feet): Increase flour to 2 1/2 cups. Add 2 teaspoons water with flour and reduce both granulated sugar and brown sugar to 2/3 cup each. Bake drop cookies for 8 to 10 minutes and pan cookie for 17 to 19 minutes.
Yield.
- Chicken Soup
What, you didn't think the Siren was going to admit the movie has flaws? Good as it is, it does. The Siren here appropriates Randall Jarrell's line, and describes a movie as a narrative film of some length with something wrong with it. Here's what's wrong with The Letter: Gale Sondergaard. A fine actress, she is ten different kinds of wrong in this scene. That she looks about Asian as the Siren does is just the start. (I know, I know, she's "Eurasian"--please. Her makeup is straight-up yellowface.) Sondergaard has no English lines and she overcompensates, with a body almost stiff with hatred, a mouth pulled down hard at the corners and eyes bulging more than Davis's ever did on her worst day. It's a Dragon Lady, all the more so because the other Asian characters in the movie are at such pains to put a veneer over their hatred. The moment when Davis must kneel to retrieve the letter is knocked out of kilter, because you are wondering if Sondergaard is actually going to kick her. The moment of reverse subservience is there, the tension is maintained, it's undeniably effective. But the Siren dislikes the way Sondergaard's stereotypical playing feeds right into the quietly devastating racism Leslie had expressed earlier: "Horrible. She was all covered with gold chains and bracelets and spangles, her face like a mask." Instead of highlighting how Leslie's prejudices played a part in her fury over being jilted, a point established so beautifully earlier, we get Leslie's bias confirmed, in spades. Given Wyler's famed obsession with his actors, it seems likely that this was his choice as well as Sondergaard's, and it just doesn't work. It even makes the Code-mandated ending worse, by raising the question of why, if Hammond's widow hated Leslie this much, she would wait until after an acquittal to murder her.
Serve with Totopos (Nachos) and Habanero Sauce(if you like spicy food).
With that as my inspiration, I started building a soft, feminine room full of airy white and serene gray, all accented with delicate lavender, gold accents and a punch of black here and there. This is the kind of room I would sleep in if hubby wouldn't throw a fit about it being super girly :)
What I did with that contribution was make the donation to Monterey Bay Aquarium/Seafood Watch in AB's honor from his fans at All About Alton. :) The nice lady said they would send him a card telling him about the donation in his honor.
And if that's not enough to tempt the child inside you to buy a copy, how about the fact that it's come down in price?!! The hefty £2.50 price tag of Dandy Xtreme, now a much more palatable £1.50.... oh, and it's back to being a weekly title again too!
...and being even more unconvinced that the curator had a clue what she was talking about (qotd - decribing pure evil as 'a little bit naughty'!)...
1/2C mayonnaise
"I lost the argument. Questor did not get the girl. But I remember driving home that night, I was kind of happy. I was saying 'You know, in your whole writing career how many times will you get an opportunity to create a whole new area of intolerance?'" Part of the album was made up of a recording of Roddenberry talking before a live audience. If I recall correctly, it may have been one of the college lectures that he was doing at the time. Aside from Star Trek, he also spoke about his then-recent efforts to launch a new sci-fi pilot, The Questor Tapes.
Why Mister X?
"I'm ready to go back down when you are. You ready?"
The guy gives the policeman N1000 naira note,
They sat at a table in a room heated by many cameras. All of it was Cassandra's fault. She was the one that had decided the two of them needed to hop onto the Reality TV bandwagon.
you can pick up the ebook here:
My dad was telling me a while ago that he needed a way to remember all the grand-kiddos birthdays and so scraps in hand, he will be getting this festive little Birthday Board! The frame was even a scrap--leftover from grandma's house.
"The spirit of Christmas illuminates the picture window of the soul.
and servant among all human beings.
7. Creole Wind
Given that songs are effectively exploited in their "sound recorded" form across different mediums, a denial of the right to share in the proceeds of such exploitation in favour of underlying artists' is downright unjust. And must be redressed at the earliest.
its the proximity of atoms
While this will be the first officially-sanctioned crossing over of the two properties–facilitated by IDW’s current licenses to publish comics based on both shows–Trekkies and perhaps a few diehard Whovians know that there have been a few scattershot, oblique references to the Doctor in the occasional Trek novel over the years. The one I tend to remember is in an older book, My Enemy, My Ally by Diane Duane, in which she has a scene with Enterprise crewmembers watching a holographic story featuring what can only be Tom Baker’s Doctor, scarf and all. There also was word that producer Russell T. Davies, while working on the Doctor Who series several years ago, had explored the possibility of an on-screen crossover with Star Trek: Enterprise, which still was in production at that time.
I can’t tell you how decidedly perverse this statement is. We don’t design worship to be culturally friendly. The very fact of worship makes it counter-cultural to begin with. Worshiping Jesus Christ is even more terrifying to most people. We are not worshiping a soft cuddly lamb white with wool. The Revelation we read last week said that the Lamb is a Lion, the Lamb was slain, the Lamb is worthy: The Lamb is God! The worship we offer—whatever worship we offer and wherever we offer it—is to be holy and pleasing to God! Culture does not determine the nature of worship: God determines the nature of worship.
Bob: "Oh! Get me a barrel of that too."
- Public masturbation
The fact is shit happens everywhere. You really could make a book of the terrible things that happen at ball parks or stadiums, just ask Brian Stow. If you don’t know the name, google him im sure you have heard the story. It is unfortunate but the sad truth is it doesn’t matter what city you’re in shit could hit the fan, even at a Charlotte Bobcats game and they only get 100 fans in that stadium all rooting for the other team.
Be yourself. I want my kids to be themselves. Not be someone who other people want them to be, or be someone else to show off. They are great kids and they should like who they are.
amentum n.; catkin. But I shan't be raving on about the beauty of the pollen-dusted amentums next spring. Will stick to catkin, if you please.
And when I do miss the target, oh boy, it certainly hurts like hell - I found out again this week!
So, because I am inept,
C. federal aid for internal improvements.
Hope that everyone had a fantastic week, and cheers to a lovely weekend! Xoxo
and with warming lips spit hope
Whether you’re following a year-round schedule or keeping your child’s mind sharp during a break from regular lessons, IXL is a place to truly learn math. Because IXL is web-based, it’s accessible wherever you have the internet, whether you’re at home or on a family vacation. Let
I just can’t see how it could be.
Here’s a couple photos taken on our wedding day:
Our neighbors who had become my parents friends’ were saddened about what they have learned and witnessed. Since our house was located in front of the chapel, nobody had missed that day when we had moved. They still cannot believe that a nipa hut which had been the only home our family ever had would be the cause of envy and hurt. My mom kept her emotions intact long enough, until we arrived at our new apartment. It was only then she let the tears and herself go, still finding it hard to accept that we were driven out from our own home.
What else makes a good last chapter? Not introducing new dilemmas, or main conflicts. It's too late. The reader will go, "Where'd that come from?" You can hint at one, if you're writing a sequel. But main dilemma is rarely wrapped in the ending chapter. More often you need to finish tying dilemma threads in the next-to-last (penultimate) chapter.
Greece's Dephosphorus on the other hand grabbed me immediately. A welcomed change in production affixed with strained, viral like vocals, textured drums and guitars that jumped from grinding lines to His Hero is Gone style riffs makes Dephosphorus's side far superior. For those of you that heard their previous effort Axiom, be thankful that Dephosphorus has done a better job in producing this split material (that snare drum that stuck out on Axiom is long gone). The only downside of their effort is the lack of time to venture into the spacey cosmo stuff that made Axiom such a gem.
Hey. We're all swimming in this big huge sea of writers, and what helps one, helps the many. I've posted a lot about how hard my struggle has been to get here, how many years I suffered, and how some months, I had trouble paying the bills. I've written a lot about how ecstatic I am that now I am finally, finally, having some success.
James let him try his 100% fruit Popsicle...
to the Magic Kingdom parking lot and my car.
The Memorial is a private, non-profit undertaking financed by admission fees and contributions, and does not accept any government funding. Based on what I've read, it seems that because of excellent management and the generous contributions of thousands of donars at all levels, the Memorial is in pretty good fiscal shape, although this is apparently never taken for granted and fund-raising is ongoing.
A NYC Taxi driver wrote:
2. Love everybody else as much as you love yourself.
“He can’t defend himself against this passion. But after a quarter of an hour of “Solomon” I try to protect the lion. I say: Tigerli, that’s enough!”
01. Metropolis – Time of War (6:31)
COVERAGE OF STORMS REMAINS QUESTIONABLE FRI…WITH MODEL CONSENSUS GENERALLY SPLIT WITH REGARDS TO THE TIMING OF AN UPPER WAVE…LOCATED ACROSS ERN NM AS OF 03Z/FRI. FASTER PROGRESSION AS SUGGESTED BY SOME NEWER MODEL RUNS WOULD SUGGEST AT LEAST SHORT WAVE RIDGING/SUBSIDENCE IN ITS WAKE…POTENTIALLY LIMITING A GREATER COVERAGE OF STORMS. REGARDLESS…ALL FORECASTS SUGGEST CONVECTIVE INHIBITION WILL BE OVERCOME…WITH AT LEAST ISOLATED DEVELOPMENT ALONG THE DRYLINE. GIVEN THE EXTREME INSTABILITY AND MODEST DEEP LAYER FLOW…SUPERCELLS CAPABLE OF SIGNIFICANT HAIL AND DMGG WINDS WILL BE POSSIBLE.
Bookmarked will be back in just under two weeks, time really flies, on Monday the 3rd of October for a Victorian themed evening (with two of my favourite books of 2011 and their authors) of ‘Sensational Stories’ as Jane Harris will be discussing ‘Gillespie and I’ and Carol Birch will be talking about ‘Jamrach’s Menagerie’, as well as all things Victoriana based, to say I am excited would be an understatement. I hope to see you there (if not I will report back again)!
Until then, au revoir. And if you’ve ever had a deplorably awful spring break – friend, my sympathies are with you.
4. June Carter Cash + Homer & Jethro - Baby, It's Cold Outside
It is the Sabbath and Jesus is not only not in the mood for a scene but He senses that the woman has a tender heart. There is an opportunity to speak to her heart. Instead of answering them and debating them he stoops to write on the ground. He begins to write out what is wrong with their plan. At first they don’t pay attention or catch on that he is actually writing something readable so they keep pushing him to answer.
Today is a day of firsts for me.
I was just too impatient to spray-paint the inside and outside of the box .Plus it was a really tight fit. It would not have closed properly if you would only have even1 inch too much paint on the box.
Zig 2-Way Pen
After seven kids, two shows, and scores of projects, interviews, and flipped houses, we can't wait to see what's next for the Novogratz family. Any hints?
That’s one reason that I intend to run a blog which is very sexual, with virtually very little or no limits, and with uninhibited fantasies. Because I know these fantasies exist out there within LOTS of us, but we learnt to deny them because as human beings we do seek the approval of the society we belong to subconsciously and sometimes we even end up hating ourselves.
Maybe I need a break. I would LOVE to take 2 days off--just to stay at home, in bed, curled up with some good books, and no interruptions. I would love to see a grown-up movie. I would love a Girls Night.
The first is that while many of these poems celebrate the beauty and majesty of the heavens, and some even embrace the wonder of scientific discovery, quite a few are quite anti-scientific. Two examples spring to mind (both of them paradoxically by favourite poets of mine!). This excerpt from The Song of the Happy Shepherd, a very early poem by WB Yeats is a good example
We need each other.
WHY IT MATTERS: As a man, you have certain needs – the biggest need is for respect. If you are thinking of marrying a woman who cannot define respect, and doesn’t know how to give you respect, then you are going to be in for a world of hurt. The more she views marriage as a joint project with specific goals and external challenges, the more understanding and support you will get. No one wants to fly a plane with someone who doesn’t know how to fly a plane, fix a plane or navigate a plane. The more she knows about men and marriage, the better it will go for you – and the children.
“They don’t need any special safety gear for what they are working on today. Most of the model is cardboard and Blu-tack.”
Themes: Silly
As their actions are dragged out into the daylight, those who devised and ran the UK's undercover political policing are letting Kennedy be dragged out too, cutting their ties to him so they can remain in the shadows.
Her website is http://www.riderpilates.com/ if you're interested in learning more. I bought her book and the DVD and love them both. I do use the DVD more....I also plan on going to some group classes in the future. They're super small so you can get personalized attention.
Discuss:
We serve a God who delights in being in all the details. He is real and present. He cares deeply for our every need. He answers our prayers-the desires of our hearts, in His will. He gives us exactly what we need…sometimes what we need may first come as a trial. Trials encourage our faith. We are given the blessing of His guidance when we face hardships. He is always alongside us. He never leaves us or forsakes us. He is, as Caroline said last night, GIGANTIC. My four year old explained to me that God is so big, He fills everything…our hearts, our homes the world. She gets it…she has blind faith that the Lord is always with her. She is learning to depend on Him in all circumstances.
God, I love Upperclass. Nice touch, Mr. Branson.
Albarn
I hang in there, though, just like I have with my marriage. When I think about it, any (and almost every) relationship I’m part of is like that, right? Same with my writing. Time to make some conscious choices, beginning with a detailed plan of action, a few self-imposed deadlines, etc. If that current work-in-progress (wip) just isn’t working, maybe it’s time to turn my energies to another wip or begin a new one altogether. I’ve taken steps back to learn parts of the craft where I feel weak. I’ve reached out for help from fellow writers. (Now I’ve got to take the plunge and accept some of the offers— What?! Expose that disaster of a document I call ‘scratch pad’? Let people see how truly convoluted my grey matter is, lol? Nah. I’ll take fingernails being dragged down the chalkboard for $200, Mr. Trebec.”)
In January I posted the Myrtle Drive Mail Theft. Those of us who left our mail in unlocked mail boxes took a lot of heat at that time. Today I have some great news for you. The mail thieves have been caught and arrested in Pleasant Hill!
And of course I just adore these DIY neon push pins I saw on Made By Girl.
Leave it to others to parse why a crime that happened 33 years ago is a good way to remind parents of dangers “still present,” I’m going to go get some ice cream. (If I don’t ever post again, alert the police. And Psychology Today.) — L.
Where scented leaves and flickering lights
The second translation is how it was presented in church Sunday, but I and I suspect a vast part of the assembled believers heard the first from long repetition.
It was built around the 1300′s while the Joseon Dynasty ruled the peninsula. These 5 traditional houses, spread in a large and auspicious area, served as residences of high officials and important persons in the society back in those days.
But I do find it interesting that Forster bundles up his desire to be “loved by” and “even hurt by” his fictitious young man of the working classes into one package. Whether one argues it as the physical interpretation of both “loved” and “hurt” (sex, and masochism) or the emotional (romantic attachment, and heartbreak), it seems he associates the two things closely with each other and looks to embrace them both. In the sexual sense this is a difficult conclusion for people to reach unaided now; in the romantic sense it borders on the chivalric and certainly demonstrates an understanding of how love affairs are prone to work (as one would expect from a good novelist: spend long enough looking at human nature for the purposes of reproducing it and one is bound to acquire a certain amount of insight into the natural course of love).
Elected to the council in May 2011 he was one of only two councillors that the EDP have had elected at this level. His seat is up for election in May 2015.
So, right after Cameron and I arrived in Germany we found out that we were expecting again. Needless to say, it didn't work out. So, the German hospital scheduled me a D&C becuase of my history. Anyways, it's a VERY simple out-patient procedure, I've had 2 before this... no problems. So, I wake up in the hospital bed and they tell me I have to say the night. WHAT?! The night... there's no need for me to stay the night and my husband is a medic. He can handle any emergency situation. So, I stay because they tell me I can't leave.
I'm so excited to see the announcement of the Cybils winners this week. The Cybils Awards honor children's and young adult books that combine literary excellence with kid appeal. As the Cybils website states, "If some la-di-dah awards can be compared to brussel sprouts, and other, more populist ones to gummy bears, we’re thinking more like organic chicken nuggets. We’re yummy and nutritious."
When you’re purchasing a handmade reed, you are purchasing something that has been custom made for you from the beginning. The professional oboist can easily tailor a handmade reed to a student’s needs (do you want a quiet reed to play Mozart on? Done. A louder one for Mahler? Easy.) If your student is a beginner, a professional can make an easier blowing reed, yet keep the pitch stable. For just a few dollars extra, you’re getting something that is made entirely just for you.
So, it seems that even in the least famous parts of Burgundy people are striving to produce wines of great quality that are extremely enjoyable.
Step 5: Purchase organic condiments, seasonings and other flavorings.
“SAP NEWSBYTE – April 30, 2012 – Changing the face of social software by making collaboration more pervasive in organizations and business applications and processes, SAP AG (NYSE: SAP) today announced the availability of new analytics capabilities in the collaborative decision-making application SAP® StreamWork™. Users can upload, explore, analyze and visualize data directly within SAP StreamWork, and collaborate with teams to make fact-based decisions. People can also connect to data stored in SAP HANA® to take advantage of in-memory capabilities for rapid analysis of information.” See full article here.
It's also a place where kayaks can seemingly disappear into maze-like waterways, and land becomes marsh in a single step. The region has its own ecosystem. Because the terrain is constantly in flux (hurricanes, in particular, can invalidate maps overnight), the area is perfect for a fantasy novel. Need to adjust the landscape? No problem. Need to recreate the look of the island? Again, no problem. Nature does it all the time.
In addition, vaccines cause the very health conditions which are profitably treated by the pharmaceutical products of these companies. Thus, today’s entire medical racket of treating sickness and “managing disease” requires that disease to be propagated in the first place. Vaccines play a key role in causing immunological disorders, compromising the nervous system, damaging kidneys, promoting cancer and causing the very diseases that keep Big Pharma in business.
1 cramming
Year Of Release: 1977
While some companies responded to consumer demand by incorporating some cage-free eggs into their orders, the landslide passage in 2008 of California’s Proposition 2, which will ban chicken cages and gestation crates by 2015, caused buyers and suppliers nationwide to take notice.
We need to think through our schedules and our appointments and ask ourselves, “How can I make a difference for Christ and the gospel today?”
1) Outward appearance - right conversation,
I painted it up and then used a one step crackle on it.
now is the time to keep things well watered-
Don’t allow this mythologic hopeful monster to exact its price
I want to change that image. Welcome to the 10RM challenge. The rules are simply - I leave the office with a 10 ringgit note in the pocket and see exactly what culinary delights I can get for my lunch.
He said this was a good development because it meant that the ‘practical politics class' of Bersih 3.0 had been expanded to include the reporters.
60 John Street (built circa 1900)
Well gather round your chairs children and stare at me fascinatedly with your moon-faces.
Food. Of course, French food is known worldwide, and justly so. Having said that, it is possible to get mediocre or even lousy meals in Paris, and I’ve had a few. But what I really love about food in Paris is how it is taken for granted as a central part of daily life, and the infrastructure is ordered accordingly. This means that, cliché or not, you really are never far from a café or a small market. There are open-air markets in the busiest parts of the city, and in this age of big-box chain everything, everywhere, I saw multiple independent butchers, bakers, fishmongers, and pastry shops just in the part of the 5th arrondissement where I was staying and working, less than 10 minutes’ walk from throngs of tourists at Notre-Dame. (The contrast with where I live now, where the nearest supermarket is a 20-minute drive away, couldn’t be more striking.)
Ever since I watched Lord of the Rings, I’ve wanted to travel to this beautiful country. I even had dreams about it, but I’ve never posted about anything connected to New Zealand.
“Let me know if the heater’s set high enough for you,” I said. “I don’t have the setting’s just right ‘cause I’m not used to this truck. I got it for my girlfriend.” There was no reply and we drove on for a few miles, my companion gazing through the windshield at the onrushing empty highway, thinking.
was young and full of the first joy of life and action, and I think I got some of it into my pages. When I wrote the last line, I remember that I cried: 'Well, I'll never beat that' and threw the inky pen at the opposite wall." “
“Kritika”, I corrected and as I locked my hands to his, said, “At least pronounce your dance partner’s name correctly.”
Before thousands of industry professionals gathered at the Town and Country Resort in San Diego, the Brewers Association (BA) presented a trio of awards to influential members of the brewing community. Following remarks from San Diego Mayor Jerry Sanders and U.S. Representative Peter DeFazio, BA board member Dick Cantwell announced the 2012 recipients of the Russell Schehrer Award for Innovation in Craft Brewing, the Brewers Association Recognition Award and the F.X. Matt Defense of the Small Brewing Industry Award.
I am finally waving my white flag and accepting that it just is what it is.
2) Liquids are easier to digest than solids. And hey, it may be helpful to give your digestive tract a break one meal a day. There are lots of enthusiastic “articles” out there that claim this allows your digestive system to work on other things (like disease fighting, fat burning, or purging old food, etc) but it was hard to find scientific articles to back this up.
Can you please start by introducing yourselves?
I know the special blessings of a large and happy family, for my dear parents had a quiver full of children. Being the oldest of eleven children, I saw the principles of unselfishness, mutual consideration, loyalty to each other, and a host of other virtues developed in a large and wonderful family with my noble mother as the queen of that home.
It trades on public exchanges and can be bought and sold during market hours like stocks.
So I build it, brick by brick. Row by row. A high tower, like Rapunzel’s, but this has no window, nowhere to lower my hair.
The most egregious- Traffic Court (TC) STIFFED the city, the Orleans Parish District Attorney’s Office, Crimestoppers, the Public Defenders Office and others to the tune of $1.3 million last year! We are talking major stiffing. I wrote last time about TC and their new policy of mailing threatening postcards all over the region, stating your license was suspended because you forgot to pay a single traffic ticket. It turns out the postcard is phony- your license wasn’t suspended yet, but you owe an extra$100 for being in contempt of TC! This obviously brought in a box car load of new cash to TC, and that’s what we are talking about here. TC also kept another half million dollars in surplus revenue and used another $425,000 in revenue from city fines to pay its accountant.
¼ of paprika
Munsell was incensed. He thought the USDA’s actions were not only unfair, they were not in the interest of public health.
beef stew, 12.50 bucks.
Across these organisations, the union has 2,062 members.
I couldn't help myself. I had to sequester 20 or so examples and put them in a slideshow for your viewing pleaure. I enjoy exploring the less traveled niches of the retro pop culture landscape, and German Super 8's from the seventies certainly qualifies in that regard!
You are excused if at first glance you think this book is similar to Dan Brown’s “The DaVinci Code” or “Angels and Demons.” For one thing, the authors have nearly identical last names. And secondly, the stunning cover certainly makes you think of angels or demons. Both stories do deal with religious mysteries, but that’s pretty much where the comparisons end. Inspired by John Milton’s classic “Paradise Lost,” Browne has crafted a stunning supernatural thriller that goes far beyond your typical globe-trotting adventure yarn.
Paymar serves a Resource Specialist for the leftist Battered Women's Justice Program in Minneapolis, providing training and technical assistance to professionals in the criminal and civil justice system, law enforcement and the U.S. military on ways to end domestic violence.
Yet can I be blamed for not wanting to leave him at his worst? It is heartbreaking to give up on someone you love even when they become monstrous. Especially when they become monstrous. You don’t want to remember them that way. And you know, better than anyone else, the insecurities and scars that are motivating them. It seems like an act of cruelty itself to walk away. You have to learn to accept that there might be necessary acts of cruelty. That loving doesn’t always mean staying, and that sometimes you have to love yourself enough to leave.
I was disgusted. Mortified. Humiliated. Confused. Scared.
Zara has come out with their lookbook for April 2012 (starring Liu Wen - I love the increasing use of Asian models!) and it centers around the perfect white piece - shirt or dress.
Mama’s tears came when you left me to go far,
I was glad this morning to see that we’d actually gotten a little bit of snow. I thought it was just going to be sleet, so this was a nice surprise.
We made a pull string piñata just in case the weather is bad, I didn't want to be swinging a stick in my dining room. Thank you to Jordan over at Oh Happy Day for the inspiration.
Susanna Foo Chinese Cuisine is a wonderful book. When I first wrote this post, it was out of print. The good news is that it's available again. This book is totally different from the Barbara Tropp book. The food is very light and often easy to make. The recipe for fried rice is a revelation.
I took part last year also and it was so much fun, so I hope to see you at the MOABH 2012 edition!
How do coffee and tea serve us when it’s served. Heat. They are both oh so very warm. The laws of themodyamics dictate that warmth always travels to cold, thereby making the cold warmer. In other words, warmth will always overcome the cold. Such it is with a cup of coffee and the whole world at our feet. Such it is with a cup of tea and the whole world on our shoulders. Such it is, my friends…and such it shall ever be.
Again, I become dragged into the cliche of writing blogs about cliche topics. Because of my friends… Well actually it was one friend in particular… and she is beaming from ear to ear as she reads this part about her. Things I do for my friends. But I love them nonetheless.
17. Your Star
Check out this great story off of Storyplanet that uses black and white photography to emphasize the desolation being felt while explaining a drought in Kenya.
People want purpose. They don’t want reasons and they certainly don’t want excuses. They can’t really be motivated by money or driven by desire if you want the right outcomes (see global financial meltdown for evidence!)
Get the press involved.
Thursday before the New Year holiday she brought it to work wrapped up in a bag. We aren't supposed to have ANY alcoholic beverages on our work campus. I left it on my desk near my coat.... and I FORGOT it at work.
5:00 AM: The alarm goes off. Time to start another day! I throw on my workout clothes, scarf down a protein bar and head out the door to the gym.
STATUS: Defendant's motion for summary judgment and motion to dismiss for lack of jurisdiction was granted on June 20, 2011
I remove my hair clips
20 most
Bloch crafted here a crime story that slowly evolved into a horror story by way of the psychological thriller. It is a convincing character study of madness, one that cares just as much about the cause and interior workings of the mental illness as it does about the mental illness itself. Inspired by the real-life case of Ed Gein (which is said to have happened something like 35 miles from Bloch's home), this is thankfully not a mere true-crime work, but a rock-solid original piece that is grounded in reality, which gives it a much more timeless quality. Even if it is overshadowed by Hitchcock's movie.
Don't you just love it when a LO just happens to fall together infront of you and you love it - well this is one of those!!! January had a few busy busy days in getting projects done for the Graphic 45 design briefs and towards the end of it I so wanted to do a LO using Olde Curiosity Shoppe (can you tell this is one of my new FAVOURITE ranges ;) ) and I grabbed my photo and as I wanted to make it "pop" on the page I used black cardstock for my background sheet. Then the rest of it was created by tucking in bits of scraps pieces I had leftover on my desk - TRUE!!!!! Cut out a couple of the tags, add a peacock feather (no idea why I have one of these in my stash :P ) and VOILA :) Sometimes it is so good NOT TO THINK - just stick and place (although I never stick anything down till I am happy as when I am sticking down I then use a lot of 3D foam tape to give it a lot of dimension :) )
See the blessed of love
WOF X 3 1/2 inches, subcut this piece into 2 pieces that measure 3 1/2 inches X 14 1/2 inches
The lipstick itself is easy to apply and has a balm like feel to it. Due to the fact it is part of the sheer line, the opacity is minimal. Once applied onto my lips, it muted the pigmentation slightly but also gave of a hint of pink and shimmer. The translucence of the color may attract many people since it's easy to apply and will flatter most skin tones, however; the shimmer may deter some since it may be deemed "not work appropriate." I only found the shimmer to be very noticeable up close and also when it was close to reapplication.
Last night, post-bath, as the boys were engaged in their pre-bedtime ritual of coercion and bribery attempts for co-sleeping, HRH bumped into his bedside lamp, sending it crashing to the floor and breaking the bulb. I react like a medic on the battlefield. Clearing the barefoot boys from the scene and going down on hands and knees with a dustpan and brush, then the Dustbuster. Cleaner than it was before 'the incident'.
The Reflex
More soon!
Mr. Gono gave the country’s judges new vehicles, satellite dishes and televisions and allocated 79 vehicles for the Information Ministry. He announced the provision of 3,000 tractors, 105 combine harvesters and 100,000 plows for the country’s farm mechanization program. Mr. Ndlovu, the information minister, said the Reserve Bank had been getting foreign currency for imports of food and medicine.
Caerise – Leveled my Blood Elf Priest from 1 to 20, without BoAs. Caerise I am leveling as Disc. Woot! Disc!
Observation: If you watch the sequence of events closely, you will see some people coming to the scene of the accident — some initially just gaping which is understandable — after all this certainly looks tragic.
Sep 26th - Calgary, AB taught by Sherrie Siemens - Open to stores & designers
Forget that nothing here feels like a Western, nothing here feels like it belongs together. Smith and Kline never get on the same page, and their silly, childish bickering throughout the film gets old before it even gets going.
So, I am not thrilled about the Irish involvement in this, and a lot of Irish people wonder why we Ulster folk don't want to be a part of their country. Well, it for things like this. In Dublin, on the 28th June, was a solidarity march with the people of Palestine. Video here. Angry crowds sing "from the river to the sea, Palestine will be free". Free of Jews, that is. Because as everybody knows, the implication of a "free" Palestine "from the river to the sea", is one without a Jewish state called Israel parked on it.
Jean (Penelope Wilton) and Douglas (Bill Nighy) are not quite happily married. Jean obviously is the head of the household. Douglas barely makes any of the decisions. And he can barely do anything on his own. They invested their retirement fund in their daughter’s start-up business. When she fails to start it up, they have nothing left for retirement. Able to afford very little, they move to the Marigold hotel, where they can spend the rest of their lives living a little more luxuriously than in the states.
Who fell in love with the people of Uganda and cried every single time she realized her departure date was closing in? This sister.
I just love the papers in the Basic Grey Picadilly collection! The patterns are so pretty and the solids are so vibrant...the blue you see on this card is actually a piece of paper from the collection. Using paper instead of card stock for matting, keeps the card light, so I don't have to pay extra for postage AND it coordinates perfectly with the patterned papers. I really like the look of the 'text' stamps that are cropping up on cards now. The one I used is from Memory Box and it's a circle, that is why I don't have text in the embossed area..pretty sweet, huh? I stamped the butterfly onto Cryogen white card stock, colored it with Copics and die cut it. I used a Fiskars Texture plate on the yellow layer and did a little sponging on the patterned paper and the text circle.
Zombie books, of course, there’s I Am Legend and of course there’s World War Z. I did read a steampunk zombie novel, Boneshaker, by Sheri Priest; it’s very good, and I enjoyed that quite a bit.
Trent Veldkamp : Bought Mother’s Day Gifts as a xmas gift
These instructions require patience for the antics of others and determination to get the job done. It’s not a bad idea to get something inanimate to take your frustrations out on, because often getting your data successfully removed or changed will require the good faith of the person you’re dealing with. Things are not likely to go your way the first time around.
In 1990 Baby's Got A Gun would release a single 'Take The Ride' and an album 'Up' for the No Mercy label in a more rockier direction. Though by that time both Jacqui and Murray had been replaced by a new rhythm section.
+ The brief. It's a creative person's bane, but also their best friend. It's a document that provides creative marching orders. And the better it is, the better the creative. You'll find a variety of briefs used at different agencies. Most times the agencies try to have their briefs fit their business philosophies.
"Now how does this infinite divine beauty relate to our longing for beauty? I do believe that deeply rooted in every human heart is a longing for beauty... Is it not because we long to behold and be a part of beauty? We crave to be moved by some rare glimpse of greatness. We yearn for a vision of glory." ~ John Piper, Jesus Is Precious Because We Yearn for Beauty
Phil Danailovski
I love Steve - er, Dan. I mean, Michael Scott. Whoever. Whomever. He's great and I love him. This movie is flawless and the perfect mix of sweet and serious and hysterically funny. Ah, Pig-Face Draper and the Murderer of Love. That'd be a great name for a band actually.
Thus I am no longer scared of pain or set backs, as I know that after the rain the sun will eventually come out. And during the transition time, the reward for our endurance is a glimpse of an alluring rainbow.
Watched Tyler Cloyd pitch seven inning of one run, three hit ball to cool the hottest team in the IL for the win. Move Kendrick. Still say Kyle can start effectively for someone in a park with wider alleys and deeper fences.
in sorrows of loss
1973
02 - Gasoline
So, Groovy Agers, what would YOU do? To what lengths would you go to save your girlfriend or boyfriend? Would you go to FUMETTI lengths? Think carefully before you answer now. If you like, you can publish your guesses about how this story will conclude on the comments section, I will later reveal the actual ending.
You also get to recognize the types of people who work at these places and how they tick.
I have managed 2 of the three layers of my petticoat, but god I hate pins. My machine only ate one though,so that’s good.
